Focused Assessment with Sonography in Trauma and Abdominal Computed Tomography Utilization in Adult Trauma Patients: Trends over the Last Decade.Objective. We sought to describe the trend in abdominal CT use in adult trauma patients after a point-of-care emergency ultrasound program was introduced. We hypothesized that abdominal CT use would decrease as FAST use increased. Methods. We performed a retrospective study of 19940 consecutive trauma patients over the age of 18 admitted to our level one trauma center from 2002 through 2011. Data was collected retrospectively and recorded in a trauma registry. We plotted the rate of FAST and abdominal CT utilization over time. Head CT was used as a surrogate for overall CT utilization rates during the study period. Results. Use of FAST increased by an average of 2.3% (95% CI 2.1 to 2.5, P < 0.01) while abdominal CT use decreased by the same rate annually. The percentage of patients who received FAST as the sole imaging modality for the abdomen rose from 2.0% to 21.9% while those who only received an abdominal CT dropped from 21.7% to 2.3%. Conclusions. Abdominal CT use in our cohort declined while FAST utilization grew in the last decade. The rising use of FAST may have played a role in the reduction of abdominal CT performed as decline in CT utilization appears contrary to overall trends. Should bedside sonography be used first to diagnose pneumothorax secondary to blunt trauma?BACKGROUND.: Our purpose was to evaluate the effectiveness of bedside sonography (US) in the detection of pneumothorax secondary to blunt thoracic trauma. METHODS.: In this prospective study, 240 hemithoraces of 120 consecutive patients with multiple trauma were evaluated with chest radiographs (CXR) and bedside thoracic US for the diagnosis of pneumothorax. CT examinations were performed in 68 patients. Fifty-two patients who did not undergo CT examinations were excluded from the study. US examinations were performed independently at bedside by two radiologists who were not informed about CXR and CT findings. CXRs were interpreted by two radiologists who were unaware of the US and CT results. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of CXR and US were calculated. RESULTS.: One hundred thirty-six hemithoraces were assessed in 68 patients. A total of 35 pneumothoraces were detected in 33 patients. On US, the diagnosis of pneumothorax was correct in 32 hemithoraces. In 98 hemithoraces without pneumothorax, US was normal. With US examination, there were three false-positive and three false-negative results. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and overall accuracy of US were 91.4%, 97%, 91.4%, 97%, and 97%, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of CXR were 82.7%, 89.7%, 68.5%, 95%, and 89.5%, respectively. CONCLUSIONS.: Bedside thoracic US is an accurate method that can be used in trauma patients instead of CXR for the detection of pneumothorax.Scanning and War: Utility of FAST and CT in the Assessment of Battlefield Abdominal Trauma.To determine utilization and accuracy of focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) and computed tomography (CT) in a mature military trauma system to inform service provision for future conflicts.FAST and CT scans undertaken by attending radiologists contribute to surgical decision making for battlefield casualties at the Joint Force, Role 3 Medical Treatment Facility at Camp Bastion (R3), Afghanistan.Registry data for abdominally injured casualties treated at R3 from July to November 2012 were matched to radiological and surgical records to determine diagnostic accuracy for FAST and CT and their influence on casualty management.A total of 468 casualties met inclusion criteria, of whom 85.0% underwent FAST and 86.1% abdominal CT; 159 (34.0%) had abdominal injuries. For detection of intra-abdominal injury, FAST sensitivity (Sn) was 0.56, specificity (Sp) 0.98, positive predictive value (PPV) 0.87, negative predictive value (NPV) 0.90, and accuracy (Acc) 0.89. For CT, Sn was 0.99, Sp 0.99, PPV 0.96, NPV 1.00, and Acc 0.99. Forty-six solid organ injuries were identified in 38 patients by CT; 17 were managed nonoperatively. A further 61 patients avoided laparotomy after CT confirmed extra-abdominal wounds only. The negative laparotomy rate was 3.9%.FAST and CT contribute to triage, guide surgical management, and reduce nontherapeutic laparotomy. When imaging is available, these data challenge current doctrine about inadvisability of nonoperative management of abdominal injury after combat trauma.A prospective comparison of supine chest radiography and bedside ultrasound for the diagnosis of traumatic pneumothorax.Supine anteroposterior (AP) chest radiography may not detect the presence of a small or medium pneumothorax (PTX) in trauma patients.To compare the sensitivity and specificity of bedside ultrasound (US) in the emergency department (ED) with supine portable AP chest radiography for the detection of PTX in trauma patients, and to determine whether US can grade the size of the PTX.This was a prospective, single-blinded study with convenience sampling, based on researcher availability, of blunt trauma patients at a Level 1 trauma center with an annual census of 75,000 patients. Enrollment criteria were adult trauma patients receiving computed tomography (CT) of the abdomen and pelvis (which includes lung windows at the authors' institution). Patients in whom the examination could not be completed were excluded. During the initial evaluation, attending emergency physicians performed bedside trauma US examinations to determine the presence of a sliding lung sign to rule out PTX. Portable, supine AP chest radiographs were evaluated by an attending trauma physician, blinded to the results of the thoracic US. The CT results (used as the criterion standard), or air release on chest tube placement, were compared with US and chest radiograph findings. Sensitivities and specificities with 95% confidence intervals (95% CIs) were calculated for US and AP chest radiography for the detection of PTX, and Spearman's rank correlation was used to evaluate for the ability of US to predict the size of the PTX on CT.A total of 176 patients were enrolled in the study over an eight-month period. Twelve patients had a chest tube placed prior to CT. Pneumothorax was detected in 53 (30%) patients by US, and 40 (23%) by chest radiography. There were 53 (30%) true positives by CT or on chest tube placement. The sensitivity for chest radiography was 75.5% (95% CI = 61.7% to 86.2%) and the specificity was 100% (95% CI = 97.1% to 100%). The sensitivity for US was 98.1% (95% CI = 89.9% to 99.9%) and the specificity was 99.2% (95% CI = 95.6% to 99.9%). The positive likelihood ratio for a PTX was 121. Spearman's rank correlation showed at rho of 0.82.With CT as the criterion standard, US is more sensitive than flat AP chest radiography in the diagnosis of traumatic PTX. Furthermore, US allowed sonologists to differentiate between small, medium, and large PTXs with good agreement with CT results.Blunt abdominal trauma: screening us in 2,693 patients.To evaluate the accuracy of screening abdominal ultrasonography (US) in patients with blunt abdominal trauma.Patients with blunt abdominal trauma underwent US. The abdomen and pelvis were scanned for free fluid, the visceral organs were assessed for heterogeneity, and duplex US was performed if necessary. Empty bladders were filled with 200-300 mL of sterile saline through a Foley catheter. US findings were considered positive if free fluid was present or if parenchymal abnormalities that could be consistent with trauma were detected. Screening US results were compared with findings of diagnostic peritoneal lavage, repeat US, computed tomography (CT), cystography, surgery, and/or autopsy and/or the clinical course.Findings from 2,693 US examinations were evaluated and were positive in 145 of 172 patients with injuries (sensitivity, 84%) and 64 (89%) of 72 patients who ultimately underwent laparotomy with surgical repair of injuries. False-negative findings were retroperitoneal injury, bowel injury, and intraperitoneal solid organ injury without hemoperitoneum. No patient with false-negative findings died. Specificity of US was 96% (2,429 of 2,521 patients), and overall accuracy was 96% (2,574 of 2,693 patients). Positive predictive value was 61% (145 of 237 patients), and negative predictive value was 99% (2,429 of 2,456 patients).Abdominal US is useful in screening for injury in patients with blunt abdominal trauma, and its use represents a notable change in institutional practice. Diagnostic peritoneal lavage is rarely performed, and CT is used when screening US findings are positive, when injury is clinically suspected despite negative US findings, or when US is not available.Hand-held thoracic sonography for detecting post-traumatic pneumothoraces: the Extended Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (EFAST).Thoracic ultrasound (EFAST) has shown promise in inferring the presence of post-traumatic pneumothoraces (PTXs) and may have a particular value in identifying occult pneumothoraces (OPTXs) missed by the AP supine chest radiograph (CXR). However, the diagnostic utility of hand-held US has not been previously evaluated in this role.Thoracic US examinations were performed during the initial resuscitation of injured patients at a provincial trauma referral center. A high frequency linear transducer and a 2.4 kg US attached to a video-recorder were used. Real-time EFAST examinations for PTXs were blindly compared with the subsequent results of CXRs, a composite standard (CXR, chest and abdominal CT scans, clinical course, and invasive interventions), and a CT gold standard (CT only). Charts were reviewed for in-hospital outcomes and follow-up.There were 225 eligible patients (207 blunt, 18 penetrating); 17 were excluded from the US examination because of battery failure or a lost probe. Sixty-five (65) PTXs were detected in 52 patients (22% of patients), 41 (63%) being occult to CXR in 33 patients (14.2% whole population, 24.6% of those with a CT). The US and CXR agreed in 186 (89.4%) of patients, EFAST was better in 16 (7.7%), and CXR better in 6 (2.9%). Compared with the composite standard, the sensitivity of EFAST was 58.9% with a likelihood ratio of a positive test (LR+) of 69.7 and a specificity of 99.1%. Comparing EFAST directly to CXR, by looking at each of 266 lung fields with the benefit of the CT gold standard, the EFAST showed higher sensitivity over CXR (48.8% versus 20.9%). Both exams had a very high specificity (99.6% and 98.7%), and very predictive LR+ (46.7 and 36.3).EFAST has comparable specificity to CXR but is more sensitive for the detection of OPTXs after trauma. Positive EFAST findings should be addressed either clinically or with CT depending on hemodynamic stability. CT should be used if detection of all PTXs is desired.An abdominal computed tomography may be safe in selected hypotensive trauma patients with positive Focused Assessment with Sonography in Trauma examination.Positive Focused Assessment with Sonography in Trauma examination and hypotension often indicate urgent surgery. An abdomen/pelvis computed tomography (apCT) may allow less invasive management but the delay may be associated with adverse outcomes.Patients in the Prospective Observational Multicenter Major Trauma Transfusion study with hypotension and a positive Focused Assessment with Sonography in Trauma (HF+) examination who underwent a CT (apCT+) were compared with those who did not.Of the 92 HF+ identified, 32 (35%) underwent apCT during initial evaluation and apCT was associated with decreased odds of an emergency operation (odds ratio .11, 95% confidence interval .001 to .116) and increased odds of angiographic intervention (odds ratio 14.3, 95% confidence interval 1.5 to 135). There was no significant difference in 30-day mortality or need for dialysis.An apCT in HF+ patients is associated with reduced odds of emergency surgery, but not mortality. Select HF+ patients can safely undergo apCT to obtain clinically useful information.Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma in patients with confirmed liver lesions.The objective was to determine the sensitivity and specificity of Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (FAST) in patients with confirmed liver lesions and also to compare results from surgeons trained in FAST with results from radiologists trained in general abdominal ultrasound as part of the specialist training. Explorative laparotomy or CT served as gold standard.This retrospective study included all patients admitted to our institution from 2003 to 2010 registered with the diagnosis "Injury of the liver or gallbladder". Of 405 patients, 135 patients were eligible for analysis. Seventy-two patients were examined by radiologists and 63 by surgeons.We found FAST to have a sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of 79.6%, 100%, 100%, and 68.9%. There was no statistically significant difference between FAST performed by radiologists and surgeons trained in FAST.FAST remains an important screening tool in abdominal trauma including liver lesions, and can be performed at a satisfactory level by surgeons trained in the FAST procedure only.Accuracy of contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) in the identification and characterization of traumatic solid organ lesions in children: a retrospective comparison with baseline US and CE-MDCT.Localized low-energy abdominal trauma is very frequent in the pediatric population. The findings of several studies have shown that ultrasonography (US) can represent a useful and cost-effective tool in the evaluation of blunt abdominal trauma both in adults and children. However, many parenchymal injuries are not correctly visualized at baseline US examination. The introduction of specific US contrast agents contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) has enabled a better identification of traumatic organ injuries. The correct use of CEUS could therefore identify and select the children who need further diagnostic investigation computed tomography (CT), avoiding unnecessary radiation and iodinated contrast medium exposure. The purpose of our study was to assess the sensibility and feasibility of CEUS in the assessment of low-energy abdominal trauma compared to baseline US in pediatric patients, using contrast-enhanced MDCT as the reference standard.We retrospectively reviewed 73 children (51 M and 22 F; mean age 8.7 ± 2.8 years) who presented in our Emergency Department between October 2012 and October 2013, with history of minor abdominal trauma according to the Abbreviated Injury Scale and who underwent US, CEUS, and CE-MDCT. Inclusion criteria were: male or female, aged 0-16, hemodynamically stable patients with a history of minor blunt abdominal trauma. Exclusion criteria were adulthood, hemodynamical instability, history of major trauma. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy were determined for US and CEUS compared to MDCT.6/73 patients were negative at US, CEUS, and MDCT for the presence of organ injuries. In the remaining 67 patients, US depicted 26/67 parenchymal lesions. CEUS identified 67/67 patients (67/67) with parenchymal lesions: 21 lesions of the liver (28.8 %), 26 lesions of the spleen (35.6 %), 7 lesions of right kidney (9.6 %), 13 lesions of left kidney. MDCT confirmed all parenchymal lesions (67/67). Thus, the diagnostic performance of CEUS was better than that of US, as sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV, and accuracy were 100, 100, 100, 100, and 100 % for CEUS and 38.8, 100, 100, 12.8, and 44 % for US. In some patients CEUS identified also prognostic factors as parenchymal active bleeding in 8 cases, partial devascularization in 1 case; no cases of vascular bleeding, no cases of urinoma. MDCT confirmed all parenchymal lesions. Parenchymal active bleeding was identified in 16 cases, vascular bleeding in 2 cases, urinoma in 2 cases, partial devascularization in 1 case.CEUS is more sensitive and accurate than baseline US and almost as sensitive as CT in the identification and characterization of solid organs lesions in blunt abdominal trauma. CT is more sensitive and accurate than CEUS in identifying prognostic indicators, as active bleeding and urinoma. CEUS should be considered as a useful tool in the assessment and monitoring of blunt abdominal trauma in children.First-line sonographic diagnosis of pneumothorax in major trauma: accuracy of e-FAST and comparison with multidetector computed tomography.Combined clinical examination and supine chest radiography have shown low accuracy in the assessment of pneumothorax in unstable patients with major chest trauma during the primary survey in the emergency room. The aim of our study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of extended-focused assessment with sonography in trauma (e-FAST), in the diagnosis of pneumothorax, compared with the results of multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) and of invasive interventions (thoracostomy tube placement).This was a retrospective case series involving 368 consecutive unstable adult patients (273 men and 95 women; average age, 25 years; range, 16-68 years) admitted to our hospital's emergency department between January 2011 and December 2012 for major trauma (Injury Severity Score ≥ 15). We evaluated the accuracy of thoracic ultrasound in the detection of pneumothorax compared with the results of MDCT and invasive interventions (thoracostomy tube placement). Institutional review board approval was obtained prior to commencement of this study.Among the 736 lung fields included in the study, 87 pneumothoraces were detected with thoracic CT scans (23.6%). e-FAST detected 67/87 and missed 20 pneumothoraces (17 mild, 3 moderate). The diagnostic performance of ultrasound was: sensitivity 77% (74% in 2011 and 80% in 2012), specificity 99.8%, positive predictive value 98.5%, negative predictive value 97%, accuracy 97.2% (67 true positive; 668 true negative; 1 false positive; 20 false negative); 17 missed mild pneumothoraces were not immediately life-threatening (thickness less than 5 mm).Thoracic ultrasound (e-FAST) is a rapid and accurate first-line, bedside diagnostic modality for the diagnosis of pneumothorax in unstable patients with major chest trauma during the primary survey in the emergency room.Abdominal ultrasound is an unreliable modality for the detection of hemoperitoneum in patients with pelvic fracture.Detection of hemoperitoneum in patients with pelvic fracture and hemodynamic instability is important to determine the need for laparotomy versus pelvic angiography. The use of ultrasound (FAST [Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma]) for the evaluation of hemoperitoneum after blunt abdominal trauma has become widespread. However, its sensitivity and specificity in patients with pelvic fracture remain poorly defined. The purpose of this study was to determine the sensitivity and specificity of FAST for the detection of hemoperitoneum in patients with pelvic fracture and an increased risk for hemorrhage.The medical records for all admissions to our Level I trauma center from November 2003 to February 2005 were retrospectively reviewed. Inclusion criteria were presence of pelvic fracture with at least one of the following risk factors for hemorrhage: age > or =55, hemorrhagic shock (systolic blood pressure <100 mm Hg), or unstable fracture pattern. Emergency department FAST results were recorded. Surgery residents trained and certified in ultrasonography in the acute setting performed all FAST examinations and an in house attending surgeon reviewed them. Presence of hemoperitoneum was confirmed by laparotomy or abdominopelvic computed tomography (CT) scan.There were 146 patients who met entry criteria, 126 of who had a FAST examination performed. A total of 104 patients underwent a confirmatory evaluation of their abdomen with either operative exploration (n = 20) or CT scan (n = 84). Eight patients underwent diagnostic peritoneal lavage before CT confirmation and were excluded. Ninety-six patients constituted the study group. Nineteen patients presented in hemorrhagic shock. There were 11 true-positive, 52 true-negative, 2 false-positive, and 31 false-negative results. Sensitivity and specificity were 26% and 96%, respectively. Positive and negative predictive values were 85% and 63%, respectively.A FAST examination with negative result does not aid in determining the need for laparotomy versus pelvic angiography in patients with pelvic fracture at risk for hemorrhage. These patients should undergo additional confirmatory evaluation to exclude intraperitoneal hemorrhage.The role of ultrasonography in blunt abdominal trauma: a prospective study.The evaluation of blunt abdominal trauma (BAT) can be difficult because of the subtle manifestations of the injuries and because assessment is hampered by altered neurologic status. Short of laparotomy, CT and diagnostic peritoneal lavage provided the best means of accurately diagnosing intra-abdominal injury. Ultrasound (US) has recently been introduced into trauma centers in the United States as a quick, cheap, and safe method to make the diagnosis of BAT. After theoretical and practical training, one attending surgeon and one chief resident began performing trauma ultrasounds at a rural, Level 1 trauma center. The US was performed concurrent with initial resuscitation and prior to other studies. The US was then correlated with the other tests. Of the 82 tests performed, 79 correlated with other methods of diagnosis. Overall, US was 88 per cent sensitive, 98 per cent specific, and 96 per cent accurate in diagnosing intra-abdominal injuries. There were no operative sequelae to patients whose injury was missed by US. We conclude that: 1) US can be used as the initial method of diagnosis of BAT and 2) surgeons are able to perform the examination accurately.Rapid detection of pneumothorax by ultrasonography in patients with multiple trauma.Early detection of pneumothorax in multiple trauma patients is critically important. It can be argued that the efficacy of ultrasonography (US) for detection of pneumothorax is enhanced if it is performed and interpreted directly by the clinician in charge of the patients. The aim of this study was to assess the ability of emergency department clinicians to perform bedside US to detect and assess the size of the pneumothorax in patients with multiple trauma.Over a 14 month period, patients with multiple trauma treated in the emergency department were enrolled in this prospective study. Bedside US was performed by emergency department clinicians in charge of the patients. Portable supine chest radiography (CXR) and computed tomography (CT) were obtained within an interval of three hours. Using CT and chest drain as the gold standard, the diagnostic efficacy of US and CXR for the detection of pneumothorax, defined as rapidity and accuracy (sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value), were compared. The size of the pneumothorax (small, medium and large) determined by US was also compared to that determined by CT.Of 135 patients (injury severity score = 29.1 +/- 12.4) included in the study, 83 received mechanical ventilation. The time needed for diagnosis of pneumothorax was significantly shorter with US compared to CXR (2.3 +/- 2.9 versus 19.9 +/- 10.3 minutes, p < 0.001). CT and chest drain confirmed 29 cases of pneumothorax (21.5%). The diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy for US and radiography were 86.2% versus 27.6% (p < 0.001), 97.2% versus 100% (not significant), 89.3% versus 100% (not significant), 96.3% versus 83.5% (p = 0.002), and 94.8% versus 84.4% (p = 0.005), respectively. US was highly consistent with CT in determining the size of pneumothorax (Kappa = 0.669, p < 0.001).Bedside clinician-performed US provides a reliable tool and has the advantages of being simple and rapid and having higher sensitivity and accuracy compared to chest radiography for the detection of pneumothorax in patients with multiple trauma.Diagnosis and pre-operative management of multiple injured patients with explorative laparotomy because of blunt abdominal trauma.In trauma patients, injury of solid abdominal organs secondary to blunt trauma is a major source of morbidity and mortality. Different diagnostic options such as FAST sonography or CT scan have been described.Our trauma registry was used to identify multiple injured patients with blunt abdominal trauma during 2001 to 2006. Patient demographics, diagnostic and operative findings, treatment, complications, length of stay and mortality were reviewed.Of 438 multiple injured patients, 58 patients were diagnosed with blunt abdominal trauma. During examination, free fluid or organ injury could be seen in 72.4% during sonography and in 84.3% of the patients who received CT scan, giving a sensitivity of 92% for initial FAST Sonography. Nevertheless, CT scan showed a higher sensitivity in detecting bowel (84%) or mesenteric (75%) injuries, if compared to FAST. 30 (51.7%) of the 58 patients had to undergo laparotomy because of blunt abdominal trauma, giving a laparotomy rate of 6.8% because of blunt abdominal trauma in multiple injured patients.Sonography is the method of choice for initial screening and CT scan in detecting bowel or mesenteric injuries. A large intraperitoneal fluid accumulation during initial sonography in combination with unstable vital signs should lead to an immediate exploratory laparotomy.Extended focused assessment with sonography for trauma (EFAST) in the diagnosis of pneumothorax: experience at a community based level I trauma center.Early identification of pneumothorax is crucial to reduce the mortality in critically injured patients. The objective of our study is to investigate the utility of surgeon performed extended focused assessment with sonography for trauma (EFAST) in the diagnosis of pneumothorax.We prospectively analysed 204 trauma patients in our level I trauma center over a period of 12 (06/2007-05/2008) months in whom EFAST was performed. The patients' demographics, type of injury, clinical examination findings (decreased air entry), CXR, EFAST and CT scan findings were entered into the data base. Sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative predictive values (NPV) were calculated.Of 204 patients (mean age--43.01+/-19.5 years, sex--male 152, female 52) 21 (10.3%) patients had pneumothorax. Of 21 patients who had pneumothorax 12 were due to blunt trauma and 9 were due to penetrating trauma. The diagnosis of pneumothorax in 204 patients demonstrated the following: clinical examination was positive in 17 patients (true positive in 13/21, 62%; 4 were false positive and 8 were false negative), CXR was positive in 16 (true positive in 15/19, 79%; 1 false positive, 4 missed and 2 CXR not performed before chest tube) patients and EFAST was positive in 21 patients (20 were true positive [95.2%], 1 false positive and 1 false negative). In diagnosing pneumothorax EFAST has significantly higher sensitivity compared to the CXR (P=0.02).Surgeon performed trauma room extended FAST is simple and has higher sensitivity compared to the chest X-ray and clinical examination in detecting pneumothorax.Comparison of diagnostic peritoneal lavage and focused assessment by sonography in trauma as an adjunct to primary survey in torso trauma: a prospective randomized clinical trial.Lately, Focused Assessment with Sonography in Trauma (FAST) is preferred over diagnostic peritoneal lavage (DPL) as adjunct to primary survey. However, this is not evidence-based as there has been no randomized trial.In this study, 200 consecutive torso trauma patients meeting inclusion criteria were randomized to undergo either DPL or FAST. The results were then compared with either contrast enhanced computerized tomography (CECT) (in patients managed non-operatively) or laparotomy findings (in patients undergoing operative treatment). Outcome parameters were: result of the test, therapeutic usefulness, role in diagnosing bowel injury and time taken to perform the procedure.Two hundred patients with a mean age of 28.3 years were studied, 98 in FAST and 102 in DPL group. 104 sustained blunt trauma and 76 sustained penetrating trauma due to stabbing. In addition, 38 (38.7%) were FAST positive and 48 (47%) were DPL positive (p=0.237, not significant). As a guide to therapeutically beneficial laparotomy, negative DPL was better than negative FAST. For non-operative decisions, positive FAST was significantly better than positive DPL. DPL was significantly better than FAST in detecting as well as not missing the bowel injuries. DPL took significantly more time than FAST to perform.This study shows that DPL is better than FAST.Prospective evaluation of non-radiologist performed emergency abdominal ultrasound for haemoperitoneum.To evaluate non-radiologist performed emergency ultrasound for the detection of haemoperitoneum after abdominal trauma in a British accident and emergency department.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) was performed during the primary survey on adult patients triaged to the resuscitation room with suspected abdominal injury over a 12 month period. All investigations were performed by one of three non-radiologists trained in FAST. The ultrasound findings were compared against the investigation of choice of the attending surgeon/accident and emergency physician. The patients were followed up for clinically significant events until hospital discharge or death.One hundred patients who had sustained blunt abdominal trauma, were evaluated by FAST. Nine true positive scans were detected and confirmed by computed tomography, diagnostic peritoneal lavage, or laparotomy. There was one false positive in this group, giving a sensitivity of 100%, specificity 99%, and positive predictive value of 90%. Ten patients with penetrating injuries were evaluated with a sensitivity and specificity for FAST of 33% and 86% respectively.Emergency torso ultrasound for the detection of haemoperitoneum can be successfully performed by trained non-radiologists within a British accident and emergency system. It is an accurate and rapid investigation for blunt trauma, but the results should be interpreted with caution in penetrating injury.2,576 ultrasounds for blunt abdominal trauma.Determination of intra-abdominal injury following blunt abdominal trauma (BAT) continues to be a diagnostic challenge. Ultrasound (US) has been described as a potentially useful diagnostic tool in this setting and is being used with increasing frequency in trauma centers. We determined the diagnostic capability of US in the evaluation of BAT.A retrospective analysis of our trauma US database was performed over a 30-month period. Computed tomographic scan, diagnostic peritoneal lavage, or exploratory laparotomy confirmed the presence of intra-abdominal injury.During the study period, 8,197 patients were evaluated at the Ryder Trauma Center. Of this group, 2,576 (31%) had US in the evaluation of BAT. Three hundred eleven (12%) US exams were considered positive. Forty-three patients (1.7%) had a false-negative US; of this group, 10 (33%) required exploratory laparotomy. US had a sensitivity of 86%, a specificity of 98%, and an accuracy of 97% for detection of intra-abdominal injuries. Positive predictive value was 87% and negative predictive value was 98%.Emergency US is highly reliable and may replace computed tomographic scan and diagnostic peritoneal lavage as the initial diagnostic modality in the evaluation of most patients with BAT.Focused abdominal sonography for trauma (FAST) in blunt paediatric abdominal trauma.To evaluate the role of focussed abdominal sonography for trauma in blunt paediatric abdominal trauma patients, and to see if the role of computed tomography scan could be limited to only those cases in which sonography was positive.The retrospective study covered 10 years, from January 1,2000 to December 31,2009, and was conducted at the Department of Radiology and Department of Emergency Medicine, Aga Khan University Hospital, Karachi. It comprised cases of 174 children from birth to 14 years who had presented with blunt abdominal trauma and had focussed abdominal sonography for trauma done at the hospital. The findings were correlated with computed tomography scan of the abdomen and clinical follow-up. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of focussed abdominal sonography for trauma were calculated for blunt abdominal trauma. SPSS 17 was used for statistical analysis.Of the total 174 cases, 31 (17.81%) were later confirmed by abdominal scan. Of these 31 children, sonography had been positive in 29 (93.54%) children. In 21 (67.74%) of the 31 children, sonograpy had been true positive; 8 (25%) (8/31) were false positive; and 2 (6%) (2/31) were false negative. There were 6 (19.3%) children in which sonography was positive and converted to laparotomy. There was no significant difference on account of gender (p>0.356). Focussed abdominal sonography for trauma in the study had sensitivity of 91%, specificity of 95%, positive predictive value of 73%, and negative predictive value of 73% with accuracy of 94%. All patients who had negative sonography were discharged later, and had no complication on clinical follow-up.Focussed abdominal sonography for trauma is a fairly reliable mode to assess blunt abdominal trauma in children. It is a useful tool to pick high-grade solid and hollow viscous injury. The results suggest that the role of computed tomography scan can be limited to those cases in which focussed sonography is positive.Ultrasonographic applications after mass casualty incident caused by Wenchuan earthquake.Ultrasonography has been widely applied in clinical settings, and its role in the assessment of trauma has been approved. However, there are very few reports about its role in the management of mass casualties.In our hospital, we retrospectively analyzed the application, the methods, and the role of ultrasonography in rescuing the Wenchuan earthquake victims.On a total of 3,307 wounded patients, 1,207 were examined by ultrasonography, and on a part of them, a follow-up was also performed. A total number of 1,386 ultrasound examinations were performed. Among them, 115 patients received ultrasound-guided interventional diagnosis and treatments. Ultrasound screening detected 23 cases of hemoperitoneum, 45 cases of pleural effusion (blood), 1 case of traumatic intimal tear of femoral artery, 3 cases of deep veins phlebothrombosis of lower limbs, 12 cases of deep-part hematoma of soft tissues. In five cases of negative results by ultrasonography, visceral injury was confirmed later by surgery or computed tomography or contrast-enhanced ultrasonography. All the ultrasound-guided interventional treatments were performed successfully, without any serious complication. The detection rate of trauma-related diseases was 6.96% (84 of 1,207) without false positive; however, the false negative rate was 5.6% (5 of 89). The bedside ultrasound became the preferred examination for the majority of injuries in middle and later stage after earthquake (72 hours to 6 weeks), accounting for 73.9% (458 of 620) of examinations. Ultrasonography-based FAST method was the primary examination tool of trauma in the early stage after earthquake.In our hospital, ultrasonography was widely used in the triage of earthquake victims, bedside examination of severe cases, and interventional treatments. The advantages of ultrasonography such as convenience, noninvasiveness, high accuracy, and repeatability have been sufficiently demonstrated in this mass casualty, where ultrasonography played a great role in the rescue of victims of Wenchuan earthquake.Use of the focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) examination and its impact on abdominal computed tomography use in hemodynamically stable children with blunt torso trauma.The aim of this study was to evaluate the variability of clinician-performed Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (FAST) examinations and its impact on abdominal computed tomography (AbCT) use in hemodynamically stable children with blunt torso trauma (BTT). The FAST is used with variable frequency in children with BTT.We performed a planned secondary analysis of children (<18 years) with BTT. Patients with a Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS) score of less than 9, those with hypotension, and those taken directly to the operating suite were excluded. Clinicians documented their suspicion for intra-abdominal injury (IAI) as very low, less than 1%; low, 1% to 5%; moderate, 6% to 10%; high, 11% to 50%; or very high, greater than 50%. We determined the relative risk (RR) for AbCT use based on undergoing a FAST examination in each of these clinical suspicion strata.Of 6,468 (median age, 11.8 years; interquartile range, 6.3-15.5 years) children who met eligibility, 887 (13.7%) underwent FAST examination before CT scan. A total of 3,015 (46.6%) underwent AbCT scanning, and 373 (5.8%) were diagnosed with IAI. Use of the FAST increased as clinician suspicion for IAI increased, 11.0% with less than 1% suspicion for IAI, 13.5% with 1% to 5% suspicion, 20.5% with 6% to 10% suspicion, 23.2% with 11% to 50% suspicion, and 30.7% with greater than 50% suspicion. The patients in whom the clinicians had a suspicion of IAI of 1% to 5% or 6% to 10% were significantly less likely to undergo a CT scan if a FAST examination was performed: RR, 0.83 (0.67-1.03); RR, 0.81 (0.72-0.91); RR, 0.85 (0.78-0.94); RR, 0.99 (0.94-1.05); and RR, 0.97 (0.91-1.05) for patients with clinician suspicion of IAI of less than 1%, 1% to 5%, 6% to 10%, 11% to 50%, and greater than 50%, respectively.The FAST examination is used in a relatively small percentage of children with BTT. Use increases as clinician suspicion for IAI increases. Patients with a low or moderate clinician suspicion of IAI are less likely to undergo AbCT if they receive a FAST examination. A randomized controlled trial is required to more precisely determine the benefits and drawbacks of the FAST examination in the evaluation of children with BTT.Prognostic and epidemiologic study, II.Accuracy of trauma ultrasound in major pelvic injury.Trauma ultrasound (US) utilizing the focused assessment with sonography in trauma (FAST) is often performed to detect traumatic free peritoneal fluid (FPF). Yet its accuracy is unclear in certain trauma subgroups such as those with major pelvic fractures whose emergent diagnostic and therapeutic needs are unique. We hypothesized that in patients with major pelvic injury (MPI) trauma ultrasound would perform with lower accuracy than has previously been reported.Retrospective analysis of adult trauma patients with pelvic fractures seen at an urban Level I emergency department and trauma center. Patients were identified from the institutional trauma registry and ultrasound database from 1999 to 2003. All patients aged >16 years with MPI (Tile classification A2, all type B and C pelvic fractures, and type C acetabular fractures determined by a blinded orthopedic traumatologist) and who had a trauma US performed during the initial emergency department evaluation were included. All ultrasounds were performed by emergency physicians or surgeons using the four-quadrant FAST evaluation. Results of US were compared with one of three reference standards: abdominal/pelvic computed tomography, diagnostic peritoneal tap, or exploratory laparotomy. Two-by-two tables were constructed for diagnostic indices.In all, 96 patients were eligible; 9 were excluded for indeterminate ultrasound results. Of the remaining 87 patients, the pelvic fracture types were distributed as follows: 9% type A2, 72% type B, 16% type C, and 3% type C acetabular fractures. Overall US sensitivity for detection of FPF was 80.8%, specificity was 86.9%, positive predictive value was 72.4%, and negative predictive value was 91.4%. Categorization of sensitivity according to pelvic ring fracture type is as follows: type A2 fractures: sensitivity and specificity, 75.0%; type B fractures: sensitivity, 73.3%, specificity, 85.1%; and type C fractures (pelvis and acetabulum): sensitivity and specificity, 100%. Of the true-positive US results, blood was the FPF in 16 of 21 (76%) and urine from intraperitoneal bladder rupture in 4 in 21 (19%) patients.US in the initial evaluation of traumatic peritoneal fluid in major pelvic injury patients has lower sensitivity and specificity than previously reported for blunt trauma patients. Additionally, uroperitoneum comprises a substantial proportion of traumatic free peritoneal fluid in patients with MPI.Occult traumatic pneumothorax: diagnostic accuracy of lung ultrasonography in the emergency department.The role of chest ultrasonography (US) in the diagnosis of pneumothorax (PTX) has been established, but how it compares with lung CT scanning in the diagnosis of radiooccult PTX and in the determination of its topographic extension has not yet been completely evaluated.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of chest US in the emergency department (ED) in the diagnosis of occult PTX in trauma patients and to define its ability to determine PTX extension.An 18-month prospective study.A total of 109 conscious, spontaneously breathing patients who had been admitted to the ED for chest trauma or polytrauma.All eligible patients underwent a standard anteroposterior supine chest radiograph (Rx) and a spiral CT lung scan within 1 h of ED admission. Lung US was carried out by an operator who was unaware of the other examination results, both for diagnosis and for the quantitative delimitation of the PTX.Twenty-five traumatic PTXs were detected in the 218 hemithoraxes (109 patients; 2 patients had a bilateral PTX) evaluated by spiral CT scan; of these, only 13 of 25 PTXs (52%) were revealed by chest Rx (sensitivity, 52%; specificity, 100%), while 23 of 25 PTXs (92%) were identified by lung US with one false-positive result (sensitivity, 92%; specificity, 99.4%). In 20 of 25 cases, there was agreement on the extension of the PTX between CT lung scan and lung US with a mean difference of 1.9 cm (range, 0 to 4.5 cm) in the localization of retroparietal air extension; chest Rx was not able to give quantitative results.Lung US scans carried out in the ED detect occult PTX and its extension with an accuracy that is almost as high as the reference standard (CT scanning).Screening ultrasonography of 2,204 patients with blunt abdominal trauma in the Wenchuan earthquake.Abdominal injuries constitute a small proportion of all earthquake-related traumas; however, it often resulted in fatal hemorrhage. Ultrasonography has been described as an effective triage tool in the evaluation of blunt abdominal trauma. We aimed to present an overview of the diagnostic accuracy of screening ultrasonography for patients with blunt abdominal trauma admitted to various hospitals during the Wenchuan earthquake in China.We retrospectively analyzed the patients with blunt abdominal trauma who underwent ultrasonography after admission to various hospitals. Ultrasonography findings were considered positive if evidence of free fluid or a parenchymal injury was identified. Ultrasonography findings were compared with the findings of computed tomography, diagnostic peritoneal lavage, repeated ultrasonography, cystography, operation, and/or the clinical course.Findings from 2,204 ultrasonographic examinations were evaluated. Findings of 199 ultrasonographic examinations (9.0%) were considered positive. Of the patients, 12 (0.5%) had a false-negative ultrasonographic findings; of this group, 3 (25%) required exploratory laparotomy. Ultrasonography had a sensitivity of 91.9%, specificity of 96.9%, and an accuracy of 96.6% for detection of abdominal injuries. Positive predictive value was 68.3%, and negative predictive value was 99.4%.Screening ultrasonography is highly reliable in the setting of blunt abdominal trauma after earthquake. It should be used as an initial diagnostic modality in the evaluation of most blunt abdominal trauma.Diagnostic study, level III.FAST enough? A validation study for focused assessment with sonography for trauma ultrasounds in a Level II trauma center.The Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (FAST) is widely used as the initial screening tool for abdominal trauma. Several recent studies have questioned its use. Using the Trauma Registry, 1 year of data at a Level II trauma center were reviewed. All trauma patients with dictated FAST examinations were identified. Disconcordant findings were reviewed. Predictive values for determining intraperitoneal injuries were calculated. Nine hundred seventy-four designated trauma patients were entered into the Trauma Registry. Of these, 633 had dictated FAST examinations. There were 533 true-negatives, 11 true-positives, 77 false-negatives, and six false-positives. Of the 77 false-negatives, 33 had retroperitoneal injuries and 25 had intraperitoneal injuries. No adverse outcomes were identified from diagnostic delay. For predicting intraperitoneal injury, FAST had a negative predictive value of 96 per cent, positive predictive value of 63 per cent, sensitivity of 29 per cent, specificity of 99 per cent, and accuracy of 95 per cent. Our data demonstrate that FAST was useful for the initial assessment of intraperitoneal injuries. FAST was 95 per cent accurate and allowed for rapid triage to operative management when indicated. The data also confirm that a negative FAST does not exclude abdominal injury.ED evaluation of the pediatric trauma patient by ultrasonography.The purpose of this study was to determine the accuracy of ultrasound examination of pediatric trauma patients by emergency physicians. Pediatric (age less than 18 years) trauma patients presenting to the emergency department of a level I trauma center were prospectively examined with bedside ultrasound during the secondary survey of their trauma resuscitation. Examinations were performed by emergency medicine residents and attending physicians who had completed an 8-hour course on trauma ultrasonography. Trauma physicians providing care to the patient were blinded to the results of the examination. In 47 children (median age 9 years) computed tomography of the abdomen/pelvis or laparotomy were also performed and served as gold standards to verify the presence or absence of free fluid in the abdomen. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of the ultrasound examination for the detection of free fluid in the abdominal cavity was 75% (95% confidence interval [CI] 36% to 95%), 97% (95% CI 81% to 100%), and 92% (95% Cl 77% to 98%). Positive and negative predictive values were 90% (95% CI 46% to 100%) and 92% (95% CI 74% to 99%), respectively. Ultrasound examinations took an average of 7 minutes and 36 seconds, although this did not take into consideration delays created by interruptions for other diagnostic tests or procedures. An emergency physician and radiologist agreed on blinded interpretations of 83% of the examinations (kappa = 0.56). Bedside ultrasonography is a reliable and rapid method for screening traumatized children for the presence or absence of free fluid in the peritoneum even in the hands of novice sonographers.Prediction of blunt traumatic injury in high-acuity patients: bedside examination vs computed tomography.The addition of spiral computed tomography (SCT) to bedside assessment in patients with major trauma may improve detection of significant injury. We hypothesized that in high-acuity trauma patients, emergency physicians' ability to detect significant injuries based solely on bedside assessment would lack the sensitivity needed to exclude serious injuries when compared with SCT.This was a prospective single-cohort study of high-acuity trauma patients routinely undergoing whole-body SCT at a level 1 trauma center from January to September 2006. Before SCT, emergency physicians assigned ratings for likelihood of injury to 5 body regions on the basis of bedside assessment. These ratings were compared with final SCT interpretations.We enrolled 400 patients as a convenience sample; 71 were excluded. When a "very low" rating was considered negative and "low," "intermediate," "high," and "very high" were considered positive, emergency physicians were able to detect head, cervical spine, chest, abdominal/pelvic, and thoracic/lumbar spine injuries with sensitivities (95% confidence interval) of 100% (98.6%-100%), 97.4% (94.9%-98.8%), 96.9% (94.2%-98.4%), 97.9% (95.5%-99.1%), and 97.0% (94.3%-98.5%), respectively. For overall diagnostic accuracy, areas under the receiver operating characteristics curve (95% confidence interval) were 0.87 (0.82-0.92), 0.71 (0.62-0.81), 0.81 (0.76-0.86), 0.77(0.71-0.83), 0.74 (0.65-0.84), respectively.Bedside assessment by emergency physicians before SCT was sensitive in ruling out serious injuries in high-acuity trauma patients with a "very low" rating for injury. However, overall diagnostic accuracy was low, suggesting that SCT should be considered in most high-acuity patients to prevent missing injuries.FAST scanning in the developing world emergency department.To assess the utility of an existing ultrasound machine for the purposes of focused assessment sonography in trauma (FAST) scanning in a developing world emergency department (ED).Prospective study undertaken over a 12-month period. Trauma patients attending the ED were FAST scanned by one of three trained emergency medicine doctors.The ED at a government hospital in rural KwaZulu-Natal (KZN), the referral centre for 22 peripheral hospitals.All patients presenting to the ED who had sustained abdominal or thoracic trauma.Scans were recorded as positive or negative for free intra-abdominal or pericardial fluid. All results were confirmed by computed tomography, laparotomy or a second trained ED ultrasonographer, followed by a period of clinical observation.72 FAST scans were included, 52 for blunt trauma and 20 for penetrating trauma. Of the 72 scans, 15 (20.8%) were positive. FAST scanning had 100% specificity and overall sensitivity of 71.4%. When considering blunt trauma alone the sensitivity improved to 81.3%, while in penetrating trauma it was much poorer (62.5%).We propose a valuable role for FAST scanning in all peripheral hospitals for the assessment of patients sustaining blunt trauma. In rural areas with limited resources FAST scans may assist in the appropriate timely transfer of trauma patients for further imaging or definitive surgical intervention.A study on the evaluation of pneumothorax by imaging methods in patients presenting to the emergency department for blunt thoracic trauma.Pneumothorax (PNX) is the collection of air between parietal and visceral pleura, and collapsed lung develops as a complication of the trapped air. PNX is likely to develop spontaneously in people with risk factors. However, it is mostly seen with blunt or penetrating trauma. Diagnosis is generally confirmed by chest radiography [posteroanterior chest radiography (PACR)]. Chest ultrasound (US) is also a promising technique for the detection of PNX in trauma patients. There is not much literature on the evaluation of blunt thoracic trauma (BTT) and pneumothorax (PNX) in the emergency department (ED). The aim of this study was to investigate the effectiveness of chest US for the diagnosis of PNX in patients presenting to ED with BTT.This study was carried out for a period of nine months in the ED of a university hospital. The chest US of patients was performed by emergency physicians trained in the field. The results were compared with anteroposterior chest radiography and/or CT scan of the chest. The APCR and chest CT results were evaluated by a radiology specialist blind to US findings. The evaluation of the radiology specialist was taken as the gold standard for diagnosis by imaging methods. Clinical follow-up was taken into consideration for the diagnosis of PNX in patients on whom CT scan was not performed.Chest US was performed on all two hundred and twelve patients (144 female and 68 male patients; mean age 45.8) who participated in this study. The supine APCR was performed on two hundred and ten (99%) patients and chest CT was performed on one hundred and twenty (56.6%). Out of the twenty-five (11.8%) diagnosed cases of PNX, 22 (88%) were diagnosed by chest US and 8 were diagnosed by APCR. For the detection of PNX, compared to clinical follow-up and chest CT, the sensitivity of chest US was 88%, specificity 99.5%, positive predictive value 95.7% and negative predictive value 98.4%.Chest US has not superseded supine and standing chest radiography for PNX diagnosis yet in many healthcare centers, but it is performed by emergency physicians and it is an effective and important method for early and bedside diagnosis of PNX.Outcome of Blunt Abdominal Traumas with Stable Hemodynamic and Positive FAST Findings.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) is a highly effective first screening tool for initial classification of abdominal trauma patients. The present study was designed to evaluate the outcome of patients with blunt abdominal trauma and positive FAST findings.The present prospective cross-sectional study was done on patients over 7 years old with normal abdominal examination, positive FAST findings, and available abdominopelvic computed tomography (CT) scan findings. The frequency of need for laparotomy as well as its probable risk factors were calculated.180 patients were enrolled (mean age: 28.0 ± 11.5 years; 76.7% male). FAST findings were confirmed by abdominopelvic CT scan in only 124 (68.9%) cases. Finally, 12 (6.6%) patients needed laparotomy. Mean age of those in need of laparotomy was significantly higher than others (36.75 ± 11.37 versus 27.34 ± 11.37, p = 0.006). Higher grading of spleen (p = 0.001) and hepatic (p = 0.038) ruptures increased the probability of need for laparotomy.68.9% of the positive FAST findings in patients with blunt abdominal trauma and stable hemodynamics was confirmed by abdominopelvic CT scan and only 6.6% needed laparotomy. Simultaneous presence of free fluid and air in the abdominal area, old age, and higher grading o solid organ injuries were factors that had a significant correlation with need for laparotomy.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound versus MS-CT in blunt abdominal trauma.To evaluate the effectiveness of contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) in the diagnosis and characterization of hepatic, renal and splenic traumatic injuries versus conventional ultrasound (US) and multislice computed tomography (MS-CT). Between January 2005 and January 2007, 78 patients (48 males, 30 females, mean age 56 years) with blunt abdominal trauma were examined by conventional US, CEUS and MS-CT. CEUS employed a low-MI technique using 1.2 to 2.4 ml of SonoVue (Bracco, Italy) i.v. and a multifrequency transducer (2-4 MHz, Siemens, Sequoia, Acuson). CT examinations were performed on a 64 detector CT scanner (Somatom Sensation 16 or 64, Siemens Medical Systems, Forchheim, Germany) before and after administration of 120 ml intravenous contrast agent (Solutrast, Bracco, Milan, Italy) followed by 50 ml saline. The presence of hepatic, renal and splenic injuries was analyzed and the conspicuousness of findings was assessed. In 15 of the 78 patients conventional US identified solid organ injuries: 8 hepatic, 2 renal and 5 splenic injuries. CEUS identified 3 more injuries (2 hepatic and 1 splenic) that had been missed by conventional US. CEUS identified traumatic lesions in 18/78 patients. In one of the 18 patients even active bleeding could be identified by CEUS. In CEUS solid organ injuries appeared hypoechoic. MS-CT identified 18 solid organ injuries in 78 patients, corroborating the CEUS results.CEUS greatly improves the visualization and characterization of hepatic, renal and splenic injuries compared to conventional ultrasound and correlates well with MS-CT. The imaging technique detects even minor blood flow and is able to depict vascular structures in detail. At our institution it is used as an additional examination technique which supplements MS-CT in unclear cases. Owing to its bedside availability, CEUS provides a good alternative to MS-CT, especially in patients with contraindications to CT contrast agents (e.g. due to renal failure or severe allergy) and in hemodynamically compromised patients.Accuracy of sonography in detection of renal injuries caused by blunt abdominal trauma: a prospective study.This prospective study was conducted to evaluate the accuracy of sonography in detection of renal injuries caused by blunt abdominal trauma.One hundred sixty-four patients (131 M, 33 F) with a history of recent blunt abdominal trauma who were stable enough to undergo both sonography and CT scan were included in this study. All of the cases had accepted indications for renal imaging. Ultrasound, as simultaneous gray scale B-mode scan and color-Doppler study, was achieved in all of the patients as the first imaging modality. Considering CT scan as the imaging modality of choice in evaluation of renal injuries caused by trauma, sonography findings were compared with CT scan results.Of the 164 patients referred for kidney sonography and CT scan, renal damage was detected in 103 cases by CT scan (63%). In 14 patients (13.5%), bilateral renal injuries were identified. Considering grading classification proposed by the American Association for the Surgery of Trauma (AAST), 57%, 24%, 9.5%, 6% and 3.5% of renal injuries were diagnosed as grade I, II, III, IV and V, respectively, by CT scan. Of the 164 patients, ultrasound results were consistent with renal damages in 66 cases (40%). Of these patients, signs of parenchymal hematoma, perinephric hematoma and pelvocaliectasis associated with internal echogenicity were the most prevalent ultrasound findings. Overall sensitivity and specificity of sonography in detection of renal injures were 48% and 96%, respectively, with a 0.8 positive predictive value, a 0.57 negative predictive value and an overall accuracy of 79%.In spite of the availability and ease of performance of sonography in evaluation of trauma victims, this imaging modality has low sensitivity in detection of renal injuries and overlooks significant damages. CT scan should be considered as the diagnostic modality in victims of kidney trauma who are hemodynamically stable and have clear indications for renal imaging.Experience with focused abdominal sonography for trauma (FAST) in 313 pediatric patients.The use of focused abdominal sonography for trauma (FAST), which detects free fluid in the abdomen and pelvis, for the assessment of blunt abdominal trauma is gaining acceptance worldwide and has been described extensively in the general medical literature. The precise application of this technique in pediatric patients, however, has yet to be established. The aim of this study was to assess the utility of FAST in pediatric trauma patients by comparing the results of this technique with those of CT and explorative laparotomy (ELAP).We retrospectively reviewed the medical records and sonographic examinations of pediatric patients who had sustained multiple traumatic injuries for which they were treated at our hospital during a 20-month period. For all patients, FAST had been the initial screening examination for blunt abdominal trauma. We compared the FAST findings, which had been recorded as positive or negative, with the findings on CT or ELAP, which were considered definitive.A total of 313 patients (204 boys and 109 girls) with a mean age of 7.1 years were included in the study. The FAST finding had been negative in 274 patients, of whom 201 had had no clinical signs of abdominal injury and had been managed conservatively without complications. CT had been performed in 109 patients and ELAP in 11. FAST had yielded 3 false-negative and 2 false-positive results. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of FAST were 92.5%, 97.2%, and 95.5%, respectively.FAST is an effective tool in screening pediatric trauma patients for blunt abdominal trauma.The utility of focused assessment with sonography for trauma as a triage tool in multiple-casualty incidents during the second Lebanon war.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the role of focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) as a triage tool in multiple-casualty incidents (MCIs) for a single international conflict.The charts of 849 casualties that arrived at our level 1 trauma referral center were reviewed. Casualties were initially triaged according to the Injury Severity Score at the emergency department gate. Two-hundred eighty-one physically injured patients, 215 soldiers (76.5%) and 66 civilians (23.5%), were admitted. Focused assessment with sonography for trauma was performed in 102 casualties suspected to have an abdominal injury. Sixty-eight underwent computed tomography (CT); 12 underwent laparotomy; and 28 were kept under clinical observation alone. We compared FAST results against CT, laparotomy, and clinical observation records.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma results were positive in 17 casualties and negative in 85. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of FAST were 75%, 97.6%, 88.2%, 94.1%, and 93.1%, respectively. A strong correlation between FAST and CT results, laparotomy, and clinical observation was obtained (P < .05).In a setting of a war conflict-related MCI, FAST enabled immediate triage of casualties to laparotomy, CT, or clinical observation. Because of its moderate sensitivity, a negative FAST result with strong clinical suspicion demands further evaluation, especially in an MCI.Can routine trauma bay chest x-ray be bypassed with an extended focused assessment with sonography for trauma examination?The objective of this study was to investigate the feasibility of using ultrasound (US) in place of portable chest x-ray (CXR) for the rapid detection of a traumatic pneumothorax (PTX) requiring urgent decompression in the trauma bay. All patients who presented as a trauma alert to a single institution from August 2011 to May 2012 underwent an extended focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST). The thoracic cavity was examined using four-view US imaging and were interpreted by a chief resident (Postgraduate Year 4) or attending staff. US results were compared with CXR and chest computed tomography (CT) scans, when obtained. The average age was 37.8 years and 68 per cent of the patients were male. Blunt injury occurred in 87 per cent and penetrating injury in 12 per cent of activations. US was able to predict the absence of PTX on CXR with a sensitivity of 93.8 per cent, specificity of 98 per cent, and a negative predictive value of 99.9 per cent compared with CXR. The only missed PTX seen on CXR was a small, low anterior, loculated PTX that was stable for transport to CT. The use of thoracic US during the FAST can rapidly and safely detect the absence of a clinically significant PTX. US can replace routine CXR obtained in the trauma bay and allow more rapid initiation of definitive imaging studies. Utility of extended FAST in blunt chest trauma: is it the time to be used in the ATLS algorithm?The clinical significance of extended Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (EFAST) for diagnosis of pneumothorax is not well defined.To investigate the utility of EFAST in blunt chest trauma (BCT) patients.A single blinded, prospective study.All patients admitted with BCT (2011-2013).Level 1 trauma center in Qatar.Patients were screened by EFAST and results were compared to the clinical examination (CE) and chest X-ray (CXR). Chest-computed tomography (CT) scoring system was used to confirm and measure the pneumothorax. Diagnostic accuracy of diagnostic modalities of pneumothorax was measured using sensitivity, specificity, predictive values (PVs), and likelihood ratio.A total of 305 BCT patients were included with median age of 34 (18-75). Chest CT was positive for pneumothorax in 75 (24.6 %) cases; of which 11 % had bilateral pneumothorax. Chest CT confirmed the diagnosis of pneumothorax in 43, 41, and 11 % of those who were initially diagnosed by EFAST, CE, and CXR, respectively. EFAST was positive in 42 hemithoraces and its sensitivity (43 %) was higher in comparison to CXR (11 %). Positive and negative PVs of EFAST were 76 and 92 %, respectively. The frequency of missed cases by CXR was higher in comparison to EFAST and CE. The lowest median score of missed pneumothorax was observed by EFAST.EFAST can be used as an efficient triaging tool in BCT patients to rule out pneumothorax. Based on our analysis, we would recommend EFAST as an adjunct in ATLS algorithm.The use of contrast-enhanced ultrasound for the evaluation of solid abdominal organ injury in patients with blunt abdominal trauma.The evaluation and management of blunt abdominal trauma is primarily nonoperative. Previous attempts to identify parenchymal solid-organ injury with sonography have been unsatisfactory. The use of Perflutren Lipid Microsphere (Definity) contrast-enhanced ultrasound (DUS) may provide an additional modality for evaluation of solid-organ injury with decreased risk of radiation exposure and contrast-related complications.Injured patients admitted to a state-designated Level I trauma center (January 2008 to July 2009), who showed evidence of solid-organ injury after blunt abdominal trauma on initial computed tomography (CT) were eligible for entry into the study. Patients underwent DUS examinations within 12 hours of initial CT. Ultrasound images were then compared with findings of CT for organ location, size, and grade of injury.Twenty patients with evidence of solid-organ injury on CT were evaluated with DUS. DUS correctly identified five of eight liver lesions, with a sensitivity of 62.5%. DUS correctly identified all nine splenic lesions demonstrating a sensitivity of 100%. DUS correctly identified one of two kidney injuries, demonstrating a sensitivity of 50%. Overall, the positive predictive value for all solid-organ injuries was 100%, with negative predictive value of 20%. The overall sensitivity for DUS was 79% (15 of 19 patients), and specificity was 100% (15 of 15 patients).Contrast-enhanced sonography is a potential new modality for the evaluation of solid-organ injury for patients with blunt abdominal trauma. With further research, DUS may provide a safe and accurate alternative to CT.Diagnostic study, level IV.The efficacy of ultrasonography in hemodynamically stable children with blunt abdominal trauma: a prospective comparison with computed tomography.In this prospective study we aimed to investigate the diagnostic value of ultrasonography (US) in hemodynamically stable children after blunt abdominal trauma (BAT) using computed tomography (CT) as the gold standard.Between 1997 and 2001, 96 children with BAT were evaluated prospectively. CT was performed first, followed by US. US and CT examinations were independently evaluated by two radiologists for free fluid and organ injury. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and overall accuracy of US were assessed regarding CT as the gold standard.Overall 128 organ injuries were determined in 96 patients with CT; however, 20 (15.6%) of them could not be seen with US. Free intraabdominal fluid (FIF) was seen in 82 of 96 patients by CT (85.4%) and eight of them (9.7%) could not be seen by US. We found that sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and overall accuracy of the US for free intra-abdominal fluid were 90.2, 100, 100, 63.6 and 91.7%, respectively.US for BAT in children is highly accurate and specific. It is highly sensitive in detecting liver, spleen and kidney injuries whereas its sensitivity is moderate for the detection of gastrointestinal tract (GIT) and pancreatic injuries.Sonographic examination of abdominal trauma by senior surgical residents.The focused ultrasound examination is assuming an important role in the evaluation of abdominal trauma. We evaluated the ability of senior surgical residents to independently use this technique. We also evaluated the efficacy of a single sonographic examination instead of serial examinations. Senior surgical residents underwent sonography instruction by two attending surgeons certified in the technique. Once proficiency was attained, a single sonographic examination was performed on patients with abdominal trauma triaged to a Level I trauma center. Residents obtained additional diagnostic studies deemed appropriate. Ultrasound results were compared with other diagnostic studies and clinical course. Sonography was performed on 518 patients between January 10, 1995 and June 30, 1996. Mechanism of injury was blunt in 92 per cent of patients and penetrating in 8 per cent. There were 22 true positives, 12 false positives, 8 false negatives, and 476 true negatives. Five of the eight false negatives were secondary to limited hollow viscus injuries with minimal associated intraperitoneal fluid. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 73.3, 97.5, 96.1, 64.7, and 98.3 per cent, respectively. The use of computed tomography and diagnostic peritoneal lavage decreased from 25 to 18 per cent and 3.2 to 0.2 per cent, respectively, as diagnostic tools. We conclude that surgical residents can competently perform trauma ultrasound. A single sonographic examination is effective and reliable. Sonography has essentially replaced diagnostic peritoneal lavage in our institution.Predictors for the selection of patients for abdominal CT after blunt trauma: a proposal for a diagnostic algorithm.To select parameters that can predict which patients should receive abdominal computed tomography (CT) after high-energy blunt trauma.Abdominal CT accurately detects injuries of the abdomen, pelvis, and lumbar spine, but has important disadvantages. More evidence for an appropriate patient selection for CT is required.A prospective observational study was performed on consecutive adult high-energy blunt trauma patients. All patients received primary and secondary surveys according to the advanced trauma life support, sonography (focused assessment with sonography for trauma [FAST]), conventional radiography (CR) of the chest, pelvis, and spine and routine abdominal CT. Parameters from prehospital information, physical examination, laboratory investigations, FAST, and CR were prospectively recorded for all patients. Independent predictors for the presence of > or =1 injuries on abdominal CT were determined using a multivariate logistic regression analysis.A total of 1040 patients were included, 309 had injuries on abdominal CT. Nine parameters were independent predictors for injuries on CT: abnormal CR of the pelvis (odds ratio [OR], 46.8), lumbar spine (OR, 16.2), and chest (OR, 2.37), abnormal FAST (OR, 26.7), abnormalities in physical examination of the abdomen/pelvis (OR, 2.41) or lumbar spine (OR 2.53), base excess <-3 (OR, 2.39), systolic blood pressure <90 mm Hg (OR, 3.81), and long bone fractures (OR, 1.61). The prediction model based on these predictors resulted in a R of 0.60, a sensitivity of 97%, and a specificity of 33%. A diagnostic algorithm was subsequently proposed, which could reduce CT usage with 22% as compared with a routine use.Based on parameters from physical examination, laboratory, FAST, and CR, we created a prediction model with a high sensitivity to select patients for abdominal CT after blunt trauma. A diagnostic algorithm was proposed.Emergency focussed assessment with sonography in trauma (FAST) and haemodynamic stability.Focussed assessment with sonography in trauma (FAST) has assumed a key role in the rapid non-invasive assessment of thoracoabdominal trauma and assists in decreasing disposition time. This study evaluates FAST's efficacy with respect to haemodynamic stability in a South African emergency department (ED).Data were collected prospectively by four emergency medicine doctors trained in emergency ultrasonography. FAST scans were performed by one ED doctor and timings, scan result and disposition were recorded. Patient haemodynamic stability was assessed by the emergency doctor performing the scan; subjectively at the time of scanning and objectively using calculation of the shock index. All scan results were subsequently verified by a second ED doctor in a blinded fashion and by CT scanning or operative intervention when clinically indicated.166 FAST scans were conducted of which 36 (21.7%) were positive. Mean age was 30.6 years (SD 12.8). 74.1% of patients sustained blunt traumatic injury. Doctors' subjective haemodynamic stability assessments had higher specificity, sensitivity and predictive values than shock index alone. Haemodynamic instability and a positive FAST result were significantly related (p=0.004). Sensitivities and specificities of FAST scans for blunt and penetrating trauma were 93.1% and 100%, and 90.0% and 100%, respectively. Corresponding values for pneumothoraces were 84.6% and 100%.This study showed a valuable role for FAST in all traumas, particularly in haemodynamic compromise. As an addition to the physician's repertoire of bedside assessment tools, it improves diagnostic capabilities in comparison with simple haemodynamic assessments alone.Test characteristics of focused assessment of sonography for trauma for clinically significant abdominal free fluid in pediatric blunt abdominal trauma.Focused assessment of sonography in trauma (FAST) has been shown useful to detect clinically significant hemoperitoneum in adults, but not in children. The objectives were to determine test characteristics for clinically important intraperitoneal free fluid (FF) in pediatric blunt abdominal trauma (BAT) using computed tomography (CT) or surgery as criterion reference and, second, to determine the test characteristics of FAST to detect any amount of intraperitoneal FF as detected by CT.This was a prospective observational study of consecutive children (0-17 years) who required trauma team activation for BAT and received either CT or laparotomy between 2004 and 2007. Experienced physicians performed and interpreted FAST. Clinically important FF was defined as moderate or greater amount of intraperitoneal FF per the radiologist CT report or surgery.The study enrolled 431 patients, excluded 74, and analyzed data on 357. For the first objective, 23 patients had significant hemoperitoneum (22 on CT and one at surgery). Twelve of the 23 had true-positive FAST (sensitivity = 52%; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 31% to 73%). FAST was true negative in 321 of 334 (specificity = 96%; 95% CI = 93% to 98%). Twelve of 25 patients with positive FAST had significant FF on CT (positive predictive value [PPV] = 48%; 95% CI = 28% to 69%). Of 332 patients with negative FAST, 321 had no significant fluid on CT (negative predictive value [NPV] = 97%; 95% CI = 94% to 98%). Positive likelihood ratio (LR) for FF was 13.4 (95% CI = 6.9 to 26.0) while the negative LR was 0.50 (95% CI = 0.32 to 0.76). Accuracy was 93% (333 of 357, 95% CI = 90% to 96%). For the second objective, test characteristics were as follows: sensitivity = 20% (95% CI = 13% to 30%), specificity = 98% (95% CI = 95% to 99%), PPV = 76% (95% CI = 54% to 90%), NPV = 78% (95% CI = 73% to 82%), positive LR = 9.0 (95% CI = 3.7 to 21.8), negative LR = 0.81 (95% CI = 0.7 to 0.9), and accuracy = 78% (277 of 357, 95% CI = 73% to 82%).In this population of children with BAT, FAST has a low sensitivity for clinically important FF but has high specificity. A positive FAST suggests hemoperitoneum and abdominal injury, while a negative FAST aids little in decision-making.Physical examination combined with focused assessment with sonography for trauma examination to clear hemodynamically stable blunt abdominal trauma patients.FAST scan: is it worth doing in hemodynamically stable blunt trauma patients?During the last decade, focused assessment with sonography for trauma increasingly has become the initial diagnostic modality of choice in trauma patients. It is still questionable, however, whether its use results in the underdiagnosis of intra-abdominal injury. It also remains doubtful whether a positive focused assessment with sonography for trauma affects clinical decision making in hemodynamically stable blunt trauma patients as evidenced through abdominal computerized tomography use. The aim of this study was to evaluate the results of focused assessment with sonography for trauma in hemodynamically stable blunt trauma patients and to determine its role in the diagnostic evaluation of these patients.We reviewed our prospectively maintained trauma database. In trauma patients at our institute, focused assessment with sonography for trauma examinations are performed by surgery residents and are considered positive when free intra-abdominal fluid is visualized. Abdominal computerized tomography, diagnostic peritoneal lavage, or exploratory laparotomy findings were used as confirmation of intra-abdominal injury.In our 7-year study period, 2,980 trauma patients were evaluated at our institute, of which 2,130 patients underwent a focused assessment with sonography for trauma. In all, 18 patients had an inconclusive focused assessment with sonography for trauma, whereas 7 patients died on arrival, leaving 2,105 patients for our analysis. A total 88 true positive focused assessment with sonography for trauma were conducted. All hemodynamically stable blunt trauma patients who had a positive focused assessment with sonography for trauma (70/88) were confirmed by computerized tomography. Patients who underwent exploratory laparotomy directly (17/88) or diagnostic peritoneal lavage (1/88) as confirmation either had penetrating trauma or became hemodynamically unstable. A total of 1,894 true negative focused assessments with sonography for trauma scans were conducted, with 1,201 confirmed by computerized tomography and the rest by observation. In all, 118 false negative focused assessment with sonography for trauma were performed, of which 44 (37.3%) subsequently required exploratory laparotomy. Five patients had false positive focused assessment with sonography for trauma scans. Focused assessment with sonography for trauma scan had an overall sensitivity of 43%, a specificity of 99%, and positive and negative predictive values of 95% and 94%, respectively. Accuracy was 94.1%. In the hemodynamically stable blunt trauma group, there were 60 patients with true positive focused assessment with sonography for trauma examinations and 87 patients with false negative focused assessment with sonography for trauma examinations. In this group of patients, focused assessment with sonography for trauma had a sensitivity of 41%, specificity of 99%, and positive and negative predictive values of 94% and 95%, respectively. The overall accuracy was 95%.Given the low sensitivity, a negative focused assessment with sonography for trauma without confirmation by computerized tomography may result in missed intra-abdominal injuries. It is also observed in all focused assessment with sonography for trauma positive hemodynamically stable blunt trauma patients, confirmation is preferred through the use of a computerized tomography for better understanding of the intra-abdominal injuries and to decide on operative versus no-operative management. Thus, the use of focused assessment with sonography for trauma in hemodynamically stable blunt trauma patients seems not worthwhile. It should be reserved for hemodynamically unstable patients with blunt trauma.Absent peritoneal fluid on screening trauma ultrasonography in children: a prospective comparison with computed tomography.Although the accuracy of focused abdominal sonography for trauma (FAST) in adults has been demonstrated, results of this technique in children have been conflicting with few comparisons against computed tomography (CT), the imaging gold standard.A total of 160 hemodynamically stable pediatric trauma victims referred for abdominal CT initially underwent rapid screening sonography looking for free fluid. Both studies were interpreted in blinded fashion.Forty-four of the 160 patients had an intraabdominal injury on CT, 24 (55%) of which had normal screening sonography. Fifteen of the 44 (34%) had no free fluid on either modality. Accuracy of sonography compared with CT was 76% with a negative predictive value 81%.Sonography for free fluid alone is not reliable to exclude blunt intraabdominal injury in hemodynamically stable children given the considerable percentage of injured patients without free fluid. J Pediatr Surg 36:565-569.Correlation Between Intra-Abdominal Free Fluid and Solid Organ Injury in Blunt Abdominal Trauma.In previous studies, the diagnostic value of Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (FAST) has been evaluated but few studies have been performed on the relationship between the amount of free intra-abdominal fluid and organ injury in blunt abdominal trauma. To select patients with a higher probability of intra-abdominal injuries, several scoring systems have been proposed based on the results of FAST.The aim of this study was to determine the prognostic value of FAST according to the Huang scoring system and to propose a cut-off point for predicting the presence of intra-abdominal injuries on the Computed Tomography (CT) scan. The correlation between age and Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS) and the presence of intra-abdominal injuries on the CT scan was also assessed.This study was performed on 200 patients with severe blunt abdominal trauma who had stable vital signs. For all patients, FAST-ultrasound was performed by a radiologist and the free fluid score in the abdomen was calculated according to the Huang score. Immediately, an intravenous contrast-enhanced abdominal CT scan was performed in all patients and abdominal solid organ injuries were assessed. Results were analyzed using Kruskal-Wallis test, Mann-Whitney test and ROC curves. The correlation between age and GCS and the presence of intra-abdominal injuries on CT-scan was also evaluated.The mean age of the patients was 29.6 ± 18.3 years and FAST was positive in 67% of the subjects. A significant correlation was seen between the FAST score and the presence of organ injury on CT scan (P < 0.001). Considering the cut-off point of 3 for the free fluid score (with a range of 0-8), sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were calculated to be 0.83, 0.98, 0.93, and 0.95, respectively. Age and GCS showed no significant correlation with intra-abdominal injuries.It seems that FAST examination for intra-abdominal fluid in blunt trauma patients can predict intra-abdominal injuries with very high sensitivity and specificity. Using the scoring system can more accurately determine the probability of the presence of abdominal injuries with a cut-off point of three.Increased efficiency and cost-effectiveness in the evaluation of the blunt abdominal trauma patient with the use of ultrasound.The efficacy and effectiveness of ultrasound (US) in evaluating patients suspected of having blunt abdominal trauma are near that of computed tomography (CT) and diagnostic peritoneal lavage (DPL). Because no cost-effectiveness study has been reported, the purpose of this study was to demonstrate that US is more efficient and cost-effective than CT/DPL in evaluating blunt abdominal trauma. Over a 9-month period, 331 patients suspected of sustaining blunt abdominal trauma were evaluated at a Level I trauma center by US, CT, and/or DPL. Cost data and time to disposition were determined for analysis. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of US were similar to those reported in previous studies. There was a significant difference in time to disposition with the US group being significantly lower (P = 0.001). The total procedural cost was 2.8 times greater for the CT/DPL group than for the US group. US is not only effective in diagnosing blunt abdominal trauma, but it is also more efficient and cost-effective than is CT/DPL.Accuracy of Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (FAST) in Blunt Trauma Abdomen-A Prospective Study.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) is a limited ultrasound examination, primarily aimed at the identification of the presence of free intraperitoneal or pericardial fluid. In the context of blunt trauma abdomen (BTA), free fluid is usually due to hemorrhage, bowel contents, or both; contributes towards the timely diagnosis of potentially life-threatening hemorrhage; and is a decision-making tool to help determine the need for further evaluation or operative intervention. Fifty patients with blunt trauma abdomen were evaluated prospectively with FAST. The findings of FAST were compared with contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CECT), laparotomy, and autopsy. Any free fluid in the abdomen was presumed to be hemoperitoneum. Sonographic findings of intra-abdominal free fluid were confirmed by CECT, laparotomy, or autopsy wherever indicated. In comparing with CECT scan, FAST had a sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of 77.27, 100, and 79.16 %, respectively, in the detection of free fluid. When compared with surgical findings, it had a sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of 94.44, 50, and 90 %, respectively. The sensitivity of FAST was 75 % in determining free fluid in patients who died when compared with autopsy findings. Overall sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of FAST were 80.43, 75 and 80 %, respectively, for the detection of free fluid in the abdomen. From this study, we can safely conclude that FAST is a rapid, reliable, and feasible investigation in patients with BTA, and it can be performed easily, safely, and quickly in the emergency room with a reasonable sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy. It helps in the initial triage of patients for assessing the need for urgent surgery. Integrating eFAST in the initial management of stable trauma patients: the end of plain film radiography.The initial management of a trauma patient is a critical and demanding period. The use of extended focused assessment sonography for trauma (eFAST) has become more prevalent in trauma rooms, raising questions about the real "added value" of chest X-rays (CXRs) and pelvic X-rays (PXR), particularly in haemodynamically stable trauma patients. The aim of this study was to evaluate the effectiveness of a management protocol integrating eFAST and excluding X-rays in stable trauma patients.This was a prospective, interventional, single-centre study including all primary blunt trauma patients admitted to the trauma bay with a suspicion of severe trauma. All patients underwent physical examination and eFAST (assessing abdomen, pelvis, pericardium and pleura) before a whole-body CT scan (WBCT). Patients fulfilling all stability criteria at any time in transit from the scene of the accident to the hospital were managed in the trauma bay without chest and PXR.Amongst 430 patients, 148 fulfilled the stability criteria (stability criteria group) of which 122 (82 %) had no X-rays in the trauma bay. No diagnostic failure with an immediate clinical impact was identified in the stability criteria group (SC group). All cases of pneumothorax requiring chest drainage were identified by eFAST associated with a clinical examination before the WBCT scan in the SC group. The time spent in the trauma bay was significantly shorter for the SC group without X-rays compared to those who received any X-ray (25 [20; 35] vs. 38 [30; 60] min, respectively; p < 0.0001). An analysis of the cost and radiation exposure showed savings of 7000 Є and 100 mSv, respectively.No unrecognized diagnostic with a clinical impact due to the lack of CXR and PXR during the initial management of stable trauma patients was observed. The eFAST associated with physical examination provided the information necessary to safely complete the WBCT scan. It allowed a sensible cost and radiation saving.CEUS in abdominal trauma: multi-center study.The objective of this study was to evaluate the concordance of US and contrast-enhanced US (CEUS) with CT in the assessment of solid organ injury following blunt trauma. Patients underwent complete US examination, including free fluid search and solid organ analysis. CEUS followed, using low-mechanical index techniques and SonoVue. CT was performed within 1 h. Among 156 enrolled patients, 91 had one or more abnormalities (n = 107) at CT: 26 renal, 38 liver, 43 spleen. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for renal trauma at baseline US were 36%, 98%, and 88%, respectively, after CEUS values increased to 69%, 99%, and 94%. For liver baseline US values were 68%, 97%, and 90%; after CEUS were 84%, 99%, and 96%. For spleen, results were 77%, 96%, and 91% at baseline US and 93%, 99%, and 97% after CEUS. Per patient evaluation gave the following results in terms of sensitivity, specificity and accuracy: 79%, 82%, 80% at baseline US; 94%, 89%, and 92% following CEUS. CEUS is more sensitive than US in the detection of solid organ injury, potentially reducing the need for further imaging. False negatives from CEUS are due to minor injuries, without relevant consequences for patient management and prognosis.Association between a positive ED FAST examination and therapeutic laparotomy in normotensive blunt trauma patients.Although a positive FAST (focused assessment with sonography for trauma) examination in hypotensive blunt trauma patients generally suggests the need for emergent laparotomy, this finding's significance in normotensive trauma patients is unclear. We tested the association between a positive FAST and the need for therapeutic laparotomy in normotensive blunt trauma patients. This was a retrospective cohort analysis of consecutive normotensive blunt trauma patients presenting to two trauma centers. The outcome was therapeutic laparotomy. The unadjusted association between a positive FAST and laparotomy was odds ratio (OR) 116 (95% confidence interval [CI] 49.5-273). This association persisted after adjusting for confounding variables (OR 44.6, 95% CI 1.77-1124). Thirty-seven percent of patients with a positive FAST required therapeutic laparotomy vs. 0.5% with a negative FAST. Among normotensive blunt trauma patients, there was a strong association between a positive FAST and the need for therapeutic laparotomy. Very few normotensive patients with a negative FAST required therapeutic laparotomy.Blunt abdominal trauma: diagnostic performance of contrast-enhanced US in children--initial experience.To prospectively compare the sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography (US) with those of contrast material-enhanced US in the depiction of solid organ injuries in children with blunt abdominal trauma, with contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) as the reference standard.The study protocol was approved by the ethics board, and written informed consent was obtained from parents. US, contrast-enhanced US, and contrast-enhanced CT were performed in 27 consecutive children (19 boys, eight girls; mean age, 8.9 years +/- 2.8 [standard deviation]) with blunt abdominal trauma to determine if solid abdominal organ injuries were present. Sensitivity, specificity, agreement, accuracy, number of lesions correctly identified, and positive and negative predictive values were determined for US and contrast-enhanced US, as compared with contrast-enhanced CT.In 15 patients, contrast-enhanced CT findings were negative. Contrast-enhanced CT depicted 14 solid organ injuries in 12 patients. Lesions were in the spleen (n = 7), liver (n = 4), right kidney (n = 1), right adrenal gland (n = 1), and pancreas (n = 1). Contrast-enhanced US depicted 13 of the 14 lesions in 12 patients with positive contrast-enhanced CT findings and no lesions in the patients with negative contrast-enhanced CT findings. Unenhanced US depicted free fluid in two of 15 patients with negative contrast-enhanced CT findings and free fluid, parenchymal lesions, or both in eight of 12 patients with positive contrast-enhanced CT findings. Overall, the diagnostic performance of contrast-enhanced US was better than that of US, as sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were 92.2%, 100%, 100%, and 93.8%, respectively.Contrast-enhanced US was almost as accurate as contrast-enhanced CT in depicting solid organ injuries in children.The results of focused assessment with sonography for trauma performed by third year surgical residents: a prospective study.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) is used as a screening tool to detect hemoperitoneum in patients with blunt abdominal injuries. The aim of this study was to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of FAST performed by third year surgical residents.Data were collected prospectively in one hundred and twenty-nine blunt abdominal trauma patients admitted to King Chulalongkorn Memorial Hospital from November 2000-November 2002. FAST was used by third year surgical residents to detect intraperitoneal fluid and considered positive if such fluid was identified. Data were analyzed using the chi-square test.Of the 129 patients, there were 31 female (24%) and 98 male (76%) patients, with the mean age of 34 years. The mean Injury Severity Score was 13.2. 53 patients had proven intraabdominal injuries and 76 had no injuries. FAST was positive in 28 patients and negative in 101 patients. There were 3 false positive FAST. The sensitivity and specificity of FAST were 47.17 per cent and 96.05 per cent, respectively. The positive predictive value was 89.29 per cent, the negative predictive value was 72.28 per cent and the accuracy was 81.59 per cent.FAST performed by third year surgical residents for blunt abdominal trauma had high specificity to detect hemoperitoneum. A positive FAST is a strong predictor of significant intraabdominal injury. The need for more practices to improve sensitivity is recommended.Our new stethoscope in the emergency department: handheld ultrasound.The concept of Focused Assessment with Ultrasound for Trauma (FAST), which was introduced by Rozycki et al. in 1996, has started a new era in the management of trauma patients. Today, Advanced Trauma Life Support (ATLS) suggests bedside ultrasonography (USG) evaluation of trauma patients. We aimed to investigate the usability and the reliability of handheld ultrasound (Vscan) in determining free fluid during the initial evaluation of trauma patients.This was a multi-center, prospective study involving multiple trauma patients who presented to three hospital emergency departments (EDs). FAST was completed using Vscan by an emergency physician and an abdominal USG was performed by a radiologist on all patients. Results of Vscan, abdominal USG and other radiological studies, if performed, were compared.A total of 216 patients were included in the study. Of those, 203 had negative Vscan results, while 13 had positive results. When USG performed by a radiologist was considered as the gold standard, Vscan sensitivity for FAST was 88.9%, specificity was 97.6%, negative predictive value was 99.5%, and positive predictive value was 61.5% in our study.Vscan, as the smallest portable imaging device, seems to have a promising future as an indispensable gadget, equal to stethoscopes, in evaluating trauma and other critical patients.The utility of FAST for initial abdominal screening of major pelvic fracture patients.Focused Assessment with Sonography for Trauma (FAST) is widely used in pelvic fracture patients. We examined the performance of FAST for detecting hemoperitoneum and predicting the need for intra-abdominal hemorrhage control in major pelvic fracture patients.A 5-year retrospective study of major pelvic fracture patients was performed. The presence of hemoperitoneum was confirmed on CT or at laparotomy. The need for hemorrhage control was defined as requiring a surgical or radiological intervention for intra-abdominal bleeding. Hemorrhagic shock (HS) patients had a systolic blood pressure ≤ 90 mmHg or base deficit of ≥ 6 mEq/L on admission.A total of 120 patients were included, 42 (35 %) of which had any hemoperitoneum and 21 (18 %) had a moderate-large amount. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of FAST for any hemoperitoneum were 64, 94, 84, and 83 % and for a moderate-large amount they were 86, 86, 56, and 97 %. In HS patients the indices were 68, 93, 88, and 78 % for any hemoperitoneum and 79, 83, 65, and 91 % for a moderate-large amount. For the need for hemorrhage control, FAST had a positive predictive value of 50 % (16/32) in all and 71 % (12/17) in HS patients. The negative predictive value was 99 % (87/88) in all and 97 % (31/32) in HS patients.FAST had a good to excellent diagnostic accuracy, depending on the size of hemoperitoneum. A positive FAST result (even in HS patients) does not reliably predict the need for immediate intra-abdominal hemorrhage control but a negative FAST result renders the need for an intervention highly unlikely.Emergency ultrasound in the acute assessment of haemothorax.To evaluate thoracic ultrasound for the detection of haemothorax in patients with thoracic trauma against established investigations.Thoracic ultrasound was performed as an extension of the standard focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) protocol used at the Queen's Medical Centre for the assessment of adult patients with torso trauma. Fluid was sought in both pleural cavities using a hand portable ultrasound system by one of two non-radiologists trained in FAST. Findings were compared against subsequent investigations/procedures performed at the discretion of the attending emergency physician-supine chest radiography, intercostal drain, computed tomography, or thoracotomy. The sensitivity of the technique and the time taken to diagnosis for each investigation were recorded.Sixty one patients, 54 (89%) after blunt trauma, underwent thoracic ultrasound evaluation during the study. Twelve patients had a haemothorax detected by ultrasound and confirmed by computed tomography or by tube thoracostomy. Four haemothoraces detected on ultrasound were not apparent on trauma chest radiography. There were 12 true positives, 48 true negatives, no false positives, and one false negative scan. The sensitivity of ultrasound was 92% and specificity 100% with a positive predictive value of 100% and negative predictive value 98% for the detection of haemothorax after trauma.Emergency ultrasound of the chest performed as part of the primary survey of the traumatised patient can rapidly and accurately diagnose haemothorax and is a valuable tool to augment the immediate clinical assessment of these patients.Validity of the fast scan for diagnosis of intraabdominal injury in blunt abdominal trauma.Blunt abdominal trauma is regularly encountered in the emergency department. The aim of the study is to determine the validity of assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) scans in the evaluation of BAT in comparison to Computed tomogram/Exploratory laparotomy (CT/FLAP).This cross-sectional study was carried out at Ayub Teaching Hospital Abbottabad from January 2010 to December 2011. FAST was performed as part of the primary or secondary survey of the trauma patient in the emergency department in all patients with suspected blunt abdominal trauma. All of them also underwent either CT or ELAP depending on their clinical condition. The validity of FAST scan in comparison to CT/ELAP was documented.Our study included 100 patients with suspected blunt abdominal trauma. The mean age was 3 1.52 ± 16.79 years with 88% males. Road traffic accidents accounted for 80% cases and 20% were due to fall. Seventy percent were hemodynamically stable and 30% were unstable. Haemodynamically unstable patients had significantly more positive FAST scans and more positive CTIELAP (p < 0.05). Of the total, 52% had positive CTIELAP and 54% had positive FAST scan. Majority (28%) had splenic injury. A positive scan had a statistically significant probability of a confirmed blunt abdominal trauma on CT/ELAP; p = O.OO, OR = 8.095, 95% CI = 3.3-19.8. FAST scan had a sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of 76.92%, 70.83%, 74.07% and 73.9% respectively.FAST scan had lesser accuracy as compared to previously published local and international data. More work is required before it can be routinely utilized to triage the blunt abdominal trauma patients to laparotomy.Comparison of computed tomography and ultrasonographic imaging in the assessment of blunt abdominal trauma in children.Computed tomography (CT) has become established in the assessment of paediatric blunt abdominal trauma. However, advances in diagnostic imaging necessitate reassessment of the role of available diagnostic modalities.Experience at a paediatric teaching hospital over a 5-year period was reviewed, with direct comparison of CT against ultrasonographic imaging in 26 children presenting with acute blunt abdominal trauma.Intra-abdominal injury was diagnosed by CT in 23 of 24 patients compared with 21 on ultrasonography, although ultrasonography identified organ-specific injury in only 12 of 24 patients. CT was superior in the assessment of the multiply injured child, and identified spinal and pelvic injuries in three patients. CT augmented plain chest radiography in ten patients with associated thoracic injuries.CT is the imaging modality of choice in children with severe abdominal trauma but ultrasonography is a reasonable technique to arouse diagnostic suspicion in less severe injuries or where CT is unavailable or delayed.Emergency physician use of ultrasonography in blunt abdominal trauma.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of abdominal diagnostic ultrasonography (DUS) performed by emergency physicians for intraperitoneal fluid caused by blunt abdominal trauma (BAT).The design was a prospective, blind, observational study. During a 15-month period, a convenience sample of patients presenting to the ED with BAT necessitating CT scan of the abdomen, diagnostic peritoneal lavage (DPL), or laparotomy was studied. Scans were performed by an emergency medicine (EM) attending, or a resident supervised by an attending, using a real-time sector ultrasound scanner with a 3.5-MHz probe. Training in DUS included a 1-hour didactic session and 1 hour of practice on human volunteers. Free intraperitoneal fluid was defined as an anechoic stripe in the hepatorenal, bladder-rectal, or splenorenal space, and constituted a positive DUS study. Free intraperitoneal fluid detected on abdominal CT scan, DPL, and/or laparotomy was the criterion standard.Of 110 patients scanned, 13 were excluded secondary to technical difficulty or lack of diagnostic follow-up modalities. Of the remaining 97 patients, there were 24 females and 73 males, ranging from ages 2 to 78 years. DUS detected intraperitoneal fluid in 21 subjects, including 3 false positives. There were 6 false-negative DUS examinations. DUS had a sensitivity of 75% (95% CI 53-90%), a specificity 96% of (95% CI 89-99%), and an accuracy of 91% (95% CI 83-96%). No false-positive or false-negative DUS study occurred after the first 67 cases. The mean interval for a DUS scan was 4.9 +/- 2.9 minutes, ranging from 0.5 to 16 minutes, and the mean intervals were not different between the positive and the negative studies. The accuracies of DUS were similar in the pediatric patients, 97% (95% CI 83-100%), and in the adults, 88% (95% CI 78-95%). The hepatorenal view provided the highest sensitivity as well as the least number of uninterpretable scans of the 3 DUS views.Emergency physicians with minimal training can use DUS with fair sensitivity and good specificity and accuracy to detect free intraperitoneal fluid in both pediatric and adult BAT victims. The hepatorenal view provides the highest sensitivity for intraperitoneal fluid, although the 3-view series (with hepatorenal, bladder-rectal, and splenorenal spaces) can typically be performed within 5 minutes and may increase the specificity and accuracy.Ultrasound detection of pneumothorax compared with chest X-ray and computed tomography scan.Pneumothorax after trauma can be a life threatening injury and its care requires expeditious and accurate diagnosis and possible intervention. We performed a prospective, single blinded study with convenience sampling at a Level I trauma center comparing thoracic ultrasound with chest X-ray and CT scan in the detection of traumatic pneumothorax. Trauma patients that received a thoracic ultrasound, chest X-ray, and chest CT scan were included in the study. The chest X-rays were read by a radiologist who was blinded to the thoracic ultrasound results. Then both were compared with CT scan results. One hundred and twenty-five patients had a thoracic ultrasound performed in the 24-month period. Forty-six patients were excluded from the study due to lack of either a chest X-ray or chest CT scan. Of the remaining 79 patients there were 22 positive pneumothorax found by CT and of those 18 (82%) were found on ultrasound and 7 (32%) were found on chest X-ray. The sensitivity of thoracic ultrasound was found to be 81.8 per cent and the specificity was found to be 100 per cent. The sensitivity of chest X-ray was found to be 31.8 per cent and again the specificity was found to be 100 per cent. The negative predictive value of thoracic ultrasound for pneumothorax was 0.934 and the negative predictive value for chest X-ray for pneumothorax was found to be 0.792. We advocate the use of chest ultrasound for detection of pneumothorax in trauma patients.Blunt abdominal injury in the pregnant patient: detection with US.To determine the accuracy of ultrasonography (US) for the detection of blunt intraabdominal injury in pregnant patients and to compare differences between pregnant and nonpregnant patients of childbearing age.A retrospective review of results of all consecutive emergency blunt trauma US examinations performed at a level I trauma center from January 1995 to June 2002 was conducted. Data on demographics, free fluid location, and patient outcome were collected. Injuries were determined on the basis of results of computed tomography and/or laparotomy. The Student t test was used to detect differences between continuous variables, and chi(2) analysis was used to evaluate differences between proportions.A total of 2319 US examinations for blunt trauma were performed in girls and women between the ages of 10 and 50 years. There were 328 pregnant patients, 23 of whom had intraabdominal injury. The mean age of the pregnant patients was 24.7 years +/- 6.1 (standard deviation) (age range, 14-42 years). In pregnant patients, the sensitivity of US was 61% (14 of 23 patients), the specificity was 94.4% (288 of 305 patients), and the accuracy was 92.1% (302 of 328 patients). Pregnant patients were significantly more likely to have sustained injuries from assault (odds ratio: 2.6, P < .001). The most common pattern of free fluid accumulation detected at US in pregnant patients was that of fluid in the left and right upper quadrants and pelvis (n = 4, 29%); the second most common pattern was one of isolated pelvic fluid (n = 3, 21%).For detection of intraabdominal injury, US was less sensitive in pregnant patients than in nonpregnant patients but was highly specific in both subgroups. The sensitivity of US was highest in pregnant patients during the first trimester.Sonography in blunt abdominal trauma: a preliminary progress report.Evaluation of blunt abdominal trauma is clinically challenging. Diagnostic peritoneal lavage (DPL) and computed tomographic (CT) scanning have become primary diagnostic modalities. We examined the efficacy and role of ultrasonographic (US) studies in the initial abdominal evaluation of blunt trauma patients. Over an 8-month period, patients whose abdominal work-up indicated the need for DPL or CT were evaluated sonographically within the first hour after admission by trauma fellows (PGY-6) with at least 1 hour of theoretical training and 1 hour of practical training. Sonograms considered positive were those showing free peritoneal fluid or organ disruption. Hard copies of the sonograms were evaluated by a staff radiologist without knowledge of the fellows' interpretations or of DPL or CT results. Based on the fellows' interpretation of the real-time sonograms, among the first 163 patients studied were 11 true-positive, 146 true-negative, one false-positive, and five false-negative results. Sixteen patients had intra-abdominal injury documented by DPL, CT, or laparotomy. Ultrasonography was 91% sensitive in detecting the presence of hemoperitoneum. Overall, ultrasonography was 69% sensitive, 99% specific, and 96% accurate in diagnosing abdominal injury. We conclude that emergency sonography on admission can serve as a valuable adjunct to the physical diagnosis of clinically significant hemoperitoneum. It is noninvasive, portable, and accurate in determining the need for further diagnostic/surgical intervention.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma patients by clinicians: Initial experience and results.To describe the establishment of a service to provide bedside focused assessment sonography in trauma and to evaluate the service to date.Emergency department of an urban trauma centre.A prospective study of trauma patients who received a focused assessment sonography in trauma examination performed by a clinician managing the trauma in the emergency department. Accuracy was determined by comparing the scan interpretation with abdomino-pelvic computerized tomography, laparotomy or postmortem examination.The study period ran from 1 January 2000 to 11 September 2001 inclusive (20 months). One hundred and forty patients were included, with a final diagnosis established by computerized tomography (n = 124) and/or laparotomy (n = 18). There were 26 true-positives, 101 true-negatives, two false-positives and 11 false-negatives. Ten of the false-negative studies were performed by clinicians who had not reached accreditation. The sensitivity of focused assessment sonography in trauma was 70%, specificity 98% and diagnostic accuracy 91%.We have described the implementation of a clinician-based focused assessment sonography in trauma service within the emergency department with the support of radiology/ultrasound and trauma service. Processes for credentialling, quality assurance and training need to be in place. Significant issues exist with the length of time it takes clinicians to reach accreditation, in order that a critical mass of clinicians exists to provide a consistent service. The credentialling process should mandate a minimum number of supervised examinations.Diagnostic value of a hand-carried ultrasound device for free intra-abdominal fluid and organ lacerations in major trauma patients.Technological progress has led to the introduction of hand-carried ultrasound (HCU) imagers in clinical workflow. The aim of this study is to analyse whether examination with a HCU device is a rapid and reliable alternative to contrast-enhanced multidetector CT (MDCT) scans in diagnosis of free intra-abdominal fluid and organ lacerations in major trauma patients.31 major trauma patients with an injury severity score >15 and the necessity of a MDCT scan (standard of reference) were enrolled prospectively to this study, and additionally examined with a HCU, according to 'focused assessment with sonography for trauma' principles for the assessment of organ lacerations and free intra-abdominal fluid. The HCU device employed was of the latest generation. Statistical analysis was performed using PASW V.18.Four patients were diagnosed with free intra-abdominal fluid (prevalence 12.9%). HCU showed a sensitivity and specificity of 75% and 100%, respectively. Positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 100% and 96%, respectively. Five patients had organ lacerations (prevalence 16.1%). In these cases, the HCU was able to detect organ lacerations with a sensitivity and specificity of 80% and 100%, respectively. Therefore, a positive predictive value and negative predictive value of 100% and 96%, respectively, were calculated.In major trauma patients, examination with HCU according to the 'focused assessment with sonography for trauma' principles for the diagnosis of organ lacerations and free intra-abdominal fluid is a reliable and rapid alternative to MDCT scans and can help save precious time in emergency situations, and should, additionally, be evaluated in the pre-clinical workflow.The accuracy of focused assessment with sonography in trauma (FAST) in blunt trauma patients: experience of an Australian major trauma service.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) is a method for detecting haemoperitoneum in trauma patients on initial assessment in the Emergency Department. The aim of this paper is to present an Australian trauma centre's experience with FAST as a tool to screen for intraabdominal free fluid in patient's sustaining blunt truncal trauma.Over a 63-month period, FAST scans were prospectively studied and compared with findings from a gold-standard investigation, either computed tomography (CT) or laparotomy.463 FAST results were collected prospectively from 463 patients. 53 scans were excluded due to lack of a corresponding confirmatory gold-standard test. Overall sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values for FAST in detecting free fluid were 78%, 97%, 91%, 93%, respectively. Analysis of the credentialed operators demonstrated an improvement in accuracy (sensitivity 80%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100%, negative predictive value 94%). These findings are comparable with documented international experience.The study demonstrates that the use of non-radiologist performed FAST in the detection of free fluid is safe and accurate within an Australian Trauma Centre.Ultrasonographic diagnosis of abdominal free fluid: accuracy comparison of emergency physicians and radiologists.Blunt abdominal trauma is a diagnostic challenge for emergency physicians and ultrasonography is one of the diagnostic tools used in this type of injuries. The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of ultrasonographies performed by emergency physicians and radiologists.This prospective diagnostic study was performed in the emergency departments of two trauma centers in Iran during a period of 12 months. The subjects were all patients with blunt abdominal trauma that were candidated for abdominopelvic computed tomography (CT) scanning in our emergency departments. The results of focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) performed by emergency physicians and radiologists were compared blindly with the results of CT scans performed by radiologists. The sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values of diagnosis for different abdominal anatomic areas were calculated.In total, 450 patients undergoing FAST and CT scanning were studied. The sensitivity of radiologists' diagnoses for Morison's, splenorenal, perivesical, and pleural effusion areas were, respectively, 88.0, 70.0, 38.0, and 30.0 %. The corresponding values for emergency physicians' diagnoses were, respectively, 82.0, 60.0, 28.0, and 30.0 %. The specificity of radiologists' diagnoses in the mentioned areas were, respectively, 98.9, 100, 93.1, and 100 %, and for emergency physicians, they were, respectively, 98.9, 100, 96.0, and 100 %.Emergency physicians showed a promising performance in applying FAST in blunt abdominal trauma. The specificity of ultrasonographic diagnosis in the emergency physicians group and the radiologists group were comparable, while radiologists showed a higher performance regarding the sensitivity of the ultrasonographic diagnosis.The utility of focused abdominal ultrasound in blunt abdominal trauma: a reappraisal.Focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) has become commonplace in the management of blunt abdominal trauma. However, newer computed tomography (CT) scanners have decreased imaging time for trauma patients and provide more detailed examination of abdominal contents. It was the aim of the current study to evaluate practice patterns of FAST and abdominal CT in blunt trauma victims.This was a retrospective study of all blunt trauma patients (N = 299) who received at least 1 FAST examination in the emergency department by surgeons and were admitted. Patients were tracked for subsequent CT scanning, disposition from the emergency department, any operative findings, and survival.Twenty-one of 299 patients (7%) had a positive FAST. There were 7 deaths and 14 patients were taken directly to the operating room (OR) for control of abdominal bleeding. Thirty-one of 299 (10%) had equivocal FAST. There were 4 deaths and 8 patients were taken to the OR for control of abdominal bleeding. A total of 247 of the 299 patients had a negative FAST. CT scans were performed in 193: 15 showed a visceral injury. There were 13 deaths and 29 patients were taken to the OR (4 for bleeding). Patients with a positive FAST had a higher mortality than FAST-negative patients (P < .001) and greater likelihood for operation (P < .001). Those with equivocal FAST had a greater likelihood for operation than FAST-negative patients (P < .05).FAST examinations can identify patients at risk for hemorrhage and in whom operation may be needed and, therefore, can guide mobilization of hospital resources. FAST-negative patients can be managed expectantly, using more specific imaging techniques.Use of abdominal ultrasonography to assess pediatric splenic trauma. Potential pitfalls in the diagnosis.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the accuracy of abdominal ultrasonography (US) for screening and grading pediatric splenic injury.The use of abdominal US has increased rapidly as a method of evaluating organ damage after blunt abdominal trauma. Despite US's increasing use, little is known about its accuracy in children with splenic injury.Children (N = 32) suffering blunt abdominal trauma who were diagnosed with splenic injury by computerized tomography (CT) scan prospectively were enlisted in this study. Degree of splenic injury was evaluated by both CT and US. The ultrasounds were evaluated by an initial reading as well as by a radiologist who was blinded as to the results of the CT.Twelve (38%) of the 32 splenic injuries found on CT were missed completely on the initial reading of the US. When the ultrasounds were graded in a blinded fashion, 10 (31%) of the splenic lacerations were missed and 17 (53%) were downgraded. Seven (22%) of the 32 splenic fractures were not associated with any free intraperitoneal fluid on the CT scan.This study has shown that US has a low level of sensitivity (62% to 78%) in detecting splenic injury and downgrades the degree of injury in the majority of cases. Reliance on free intraperitoneal fluid may be inaccurate because not all patients with splenic injury have free intra-abdominal fluid. Based on these findings, US may be of limited use in the initial assessment, management, and follow-up of pediatric splenic trauma.Emergency sonography AIDS diagnostic accuracy of torso injuries: a study in a resource limited setting.Introduction. Clinical evaluation of patients with torso trauma is often a diagnostic challenge. Extended focused assessment with sonography for trauma (EFAST) is an emergency ultrasound scan that adds to the evaluation of intrathoracic abdominal and pericardial cavities done in FAST (focused assessment with sonography for trauma). Objective. This study compares EFAST (the index test) with the routine standard of care (SoC) investigations (the standard reference test) for torso trauma injuries. Methods. A cross-sectional descriptive study was conducted over a 3-month period. Eligible patients underwent EFAST scanning and the SoC assessment. The diagnostic accuracy of EFAST was calculated using sensitivity and specificity scores. Results. We recruited 197 patients; the M : F ratio was 5 : 1, with mean age of 27 years (SD 11). The sensitivity of EFAST was 100%, the specificity was 97%, the PPV was 87%, and the NPV was 100%. It took 5 minutes on average to complete an EFAST scan. 168 (85%) patients were EFAST-scanned. Most patients (82) (48%) were discharged on the same day of hospitalization, while 7 (4%) were still at the hospital after two weeks. The mortality rate was 18 (9%). Conclusion. EFAST is a reliable method of diagnosing torso injuries in a resource limited context. Diagnostic accuracy of Focused Abdominal Sonography for Trauma in blunt abdominal trauma patients in a trauma centre of Hong Kong.Focused Abdominal Sono-graphy for Trauma (FAST) is widely used for the detection of intraperitoneal free fluids in patients suffering from blunt abdominal trauma (BAT). This study aimed at assessing the diagnostic accuracy of this investigation in a designated trauma centre.This was a retrospective study of BAT patients over a 6 year period seen in a trauma centre in Hong Kong. FAST findings were compared with laparotomy, abdominal computed tomography or autopsy findings, which served as the gold standard for presence of intraperitoneal free fluids. The patients who did not have FAST or gold standard confirmatory test performed, had preexisting peritoneal fluid, died at resuscitation or had imcomplete documentation of FAST findings were excluded. The performance of FAST was expressed as sensitivity, specificity, predictive values (PV), likelihood ratios (LR) and accuracy.FAST was performed in 302 patients and 153 of them were included in this analysis. The sensitivity, specificity, positive PV, negative PV, positive LR, negative LR and accuracy for FAST were respectively 50.0%, 97.3%, 87.0%, 84.6%, 18.8, 0.5 and 85.0%. FAST was found to be more sensitive in less severely injured patients and more specific in more severely injured patients.FAST is a reliable investigation in the initial assessment of BAT patients. The diagnostic values of FAST could be affected by the severity of injury and staff training is needed to further enhance its effective use. Key words: Laparotomy; Autopsy; Tomography, X-ray computed; Tomography, spiral computed; Ultrasonography.Occult pneumothorax in trauma patients: should this be sought in the focused assessment with sonography for trauma examination?At present, CT scan is the gold standard for detecting occult traumatic pneumothorax not apparent on supine chest X-ray radiograph. Recently there were suggestions to expand focused assessment with sonography for trauma (FAST) to include thoracic ultrasound for detecting pneumothorax. The aim of the present study is to determine the incidence of occult pneumothorax (as shown by CT) in the subgroup of trauma patients undergoing FAST.Review of all trauma patients with FAST done from 1 June 2001 to 31 October 2002. Incidence of occult pneumothorax as diagnosed by CT was determined. Patients were not counted as having true occult pneumothorax if they had chest drains inserted before arrival or imaging studies. Selected clinical findings were tested for association with occult pneumothorax.In total, 143 patients underwent FAST, of whom 137 (95.8%) had chest X-ray examination performed. Of the 137 patients 59 required CT abdomen and/or thorax. Occult pneumothorax was found in three patients (2.1%). A history of thorax and/or abdominal injury plus one or more of: (i) mechanisms potentially causing major trauma; (ii) abnormal chest examination; and (iii) chest X-ray radiograph abnormality in the absence of pneumothorax, was significantly associated with the presence of occult pneumothorax (P = 0.03, Fisher's exact test; sensitivity: 100%; specificity: 71%; likelihood ratio: 3.42).The incidence of occult pneumothorax in the subgroup of trauma patients undergoing FAST is low. It implies that routine screening for its presence by adding thoracic ultrasound to FAST is unnecessary. Identifying those at risk of occult pneumothorax for further investigation appeared feasible.